In my opinion, the literature program was formed by ladies of the Balzac age based on their interests.
We preferred Danilevsky and Volkonsky from Russian literature of the 19th century.
They wrote fiction, of course, from the point of view of those same young ladies of Balzac's age.
But the psychology and suffering of the heroines of Tolstoy and Turgenev are not so interesting for teenagers.
Teenagers are generally not interested in the psychology of the characters.
Thank you very much, it was very interesting.
Maybe the roses were plush to represent a certain type?
There are roses of this color and with this structure of the petal, which looks like velvet, usually dark red or burgundy.
And the light-colored roses look different, with their petals having a satin or silk sheen.
Sharks attack surfers, mistaking them for turtles...
Bulls are apparently colour-blind.
Bears eat garbage...
Gorillas are not to be looked in the eye - in some safari parks visitors are given glasses with eyes drawn on to look away.
Bees still rely on smell...
The Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105x195 mattress.
The “Micro-package Prestige” model: comfort and natural composition.
The mattress has different firmness on the sides: the medium-firm surface is made of latex-coated coconut fiber and natural latex, and the medium-soft surface is made of natural latex.
The spring block with 1000 springs per square meter quickly adapts to the body of a sleeper, warning of the appearance of the "wave" or "hammock" effect.
Among the advantages of the model, it is necessary to highlight the breathable materials.
Latex, perforated for breathability, ventilates naturally just like coconut coir.
This maintains a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
Also, the extended warranty applies to the mattress.
The official warranty period from the manufacturer is 5 years, but the actual lifespan of the mattress is longer.
Dust and dirt protection is provided by the removable Jacquard cover supplied with the set.
Buy a pair of orthopedic pillows to go with the mattress - they are recommended for keeping the spine in an optimal position during sleep.
The filler determines the purpose of the sides - coconuts serve as anatomical support for the back, and latex relaxes the muscles.
Incorporate your brain and go after those in-laws!
Better to have none than such...
Either look for a part-time driver or someone who is willing to invest and work with you on a share.
If it doesn't work out, sell the car, even if you lose money, don't regret it.
Next time, you will think better...
Andrey, you have explained clearly that pensioners work in schools, they will not work in a team.
The computer teacher won't be able to help either, he didn't teach them this, the school is playing games in Windows.
So there is no support.
I remember these parties and guests at my parents' house with horror.
Guests at the door, and on the plate, the chef's cakes are still being fried, the mother is scrubbing the floor.
Lord, he has already sat down without strength.
And then I'll wash the dishes, and the house will be clean.
A week before the holiday, you carry the products, two days of cleaning, and one day of cleaning after.
And what about the guests?
They are doing well, and they always have a cake with them.
Since then, I don't like holidays, guests.
Even for my family, I cover the table with a tablecloth as little as possible.
And I make the ice cream myself, I bake it very often just like that.
Germany: Fourth coronavirus vaccine is inevitable
A fourth vaccine will be required in the summer or fall of 2022.
According to the expert, the current vaccination in Germany will not be the final one, but will continue with new strength.
Despite an active vaccination campaign in Germany, it is unlikely that two or three doses of the coronavirus vaccine will be enough to provide full protection.
The head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigelt, is convinced of this.
This is reported by Die Welt on Saturday, 11 December.
"We expect that the fourth vaccination will be required in the summer, at the latest in autumn," the expert believes.
In addition, Wagner hopes that the fourth coronavirus vaccine can be given "in combination with the flu vaccine".
This will help achieve the best results.
In addition, enhanced vaccination may help in the fight against the spread of the new coronavirus strain "Omicron".
And the new variant is particularly dangerous.
The probability of reinfection with Omicron is three times higher than with Delta or Beta strains.
This is evidenced by the results of a preliminary study conducted in South Africa.
Based on this, BioNTech/Pfizer plan to provide an adapted vaccine for Omikron by March 2022.
The companies stressed that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the new "Omicron" coronavirus variant.
BioNTech and Pfizer's study showed that the vaccine's effectiveness was significantly lower with two doses: "neutralizing potential is reduced more than 25 times".
"This indicates that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the omicron strain," BioNTech and Pfizer said.
Therefore, a third dose is required.
Experts insist on speeding up the pace of vaccinations in the country.
For example, the president of the German Society of Infectious Diseases, Bernd Salzberger, advocates reducing the interval between the second and third vaccinations.
Moreover, as Salzberg believes, accelerated vaccination will have an impact on the spread of both the Delta and Omicron variants of the coronavirus.
“Israel’s experience is very convincing in this regard”, the expert stressed.
Vobler Pontoon21, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54mm, 8.5g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special branch of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (as well as the Kalikana Vib series) differs from many other vibes in that it was originally designed with underwater fishing in mind, not just trolling.
These baits have a greater weight than their close-in-size counterparts, which, without a doubt, positively affects the nuances of using these interesting lures.
Another recognizable feature is the upper plastic cover made of strong and elastic plastic, which creates additional vibration tones during vertical and horizontal wiring.
As a "winter vib", Bet-A-Vib demonstrates quite an aggressive game when fishing in the drop.
Often the most interesting is the simple monotonous animation, that is, the movements of the eye up and down almost without pauses.
When planning, the deviation from the vertical axis is not very great, which is convenient when fishing in limited space, cluttered with underwater vegetation, snags and other obstacles that can be snagged.
In addition, a small deviation is relevant when fishing for winter pike and large perch, and especially in the middle of winter, when a precise and aggressive presentation of the bait is required.
Reaching the end of its trajectory, Bet-A-Vib instantly spins and returns to its original vertical position.
Bet-A-Vib is also successfully applied for winter fishing for perch.
To please her whims, you can choose from two modifications: with a noise capsule (NS – NanoSound) or without it (SL – Silent).
It was also noted that Bet-A-Vib can irritate a passive fish, which does not react even to a live bait.
The Bet-A-Vib lure demonstrates distance and accuracy.
This bobble is understandable and non-capricious, it goes well with lace and braided cords even of large diameters.
For catching perch, pikeperch, roach or bream, the "step-by-step" method, sometimes with "chirping" along the bottom, is also effective.
If you're fishing in weedy areas, you can change the front treble to a double, which will reduce the chances of snagging.
Among its class of Bet-A-Vibs, Bet-A-Vib is one of the most reliable and, as a result, one of the most easily caught.
It can be used with equal success on relatively small and quite deep areas.
All models are equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young slackers are sitting on the necks of old parents.
The “golden youth” are clearly the laggards of the majority, who know nothing and are unable to do anything.
A busy life leads to idleness.
Perhaps Mishustin was referring to this large part of the population.
You are, of course, joking.
She has never seen any shoes in this store that she would like to buy.
What kind of long-sleeved shirt are you talking about?
The shoes are made of leather.
Well, if one season can last.
"Zenden" is on the same level as "Kari".
Go there for a couple of times, look and understand that there is nothing to do there.
In Libya, they announced the presence of 7,000 Russian mercenaries
More than 7,000 mercenaries from a private military company (PMC) "Wagner" are stationed in Libya.
This was stated by the chairman of the Supreme Council of the republic, Khaled al-Mishri, on Sunday, December 12.
"Currently, there are more than 7,000 Wagner mercenaries in Libya.
They also have planes.
They also dig trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 jet fighters at the Ghardabiya airbases (also used as a civilian airport in Sirte)," the Anadolu Agency quotes him as saying.
Khaled al-Mishri also noted that Russian mercenaries "are trying to capture" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean Sea, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
Maintain presence
According to the publication's source, Moscow was looking for a country to maintain its presence in North Africa and "settled in Libya."
"Wagner" has been in Libya since 2019, using an airbase and port in Sirte, as well as an airbase in Jufra, noted the agency's publication.
Russian authorities officially deny that the Wagner Group receives support from the Kremlin.
Where else can mercenaries be found?
According to the agency, Wagner is reportedly active in nine African countries - the Central African Republic, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training for local forces, personal protection for leaders, and protection of energy facilities.
In exchange for these services, the subsidiary companies of Wagner receive certain privileges and licenses for the use of mineral resources and natural resources, as well as for the supply of weapons, technologies and military services to these countries," the article says.
According to the media, the "Wagnerites" allegedly fought in Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan and CAR.
This group is not listed in the law enforcement agencies or the register of juristic persons, and its fighters are not listed in the personnel lists.
The company is subject to US sanctions.
Recall that earlier, the EU's 27 member states' envoys approved restrictions against "Wagner".
It is expected that this decision of the European Council will be approved on December 13.
Situation in Libya
The Supreme State Council of Libya de facto is the second chamber of parliament with consultative functions, which is dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
The body has repeatedly called for the single voting day for parliamentary and presidential elections to be moved from 24 December at least until February 2022.
"Less than two weeks remain until the elections, and the chances of them being held on time are rapidly diminishing," the material notes.
Meanwhile, the High Electoral Commission of Libya has postponed the announcement of the final list of candidates indefinitely, according to Sky News Arabia.
Foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see more successes in the country's foreign policy than failures, 29% believe that failures predominate.
"Success examples - "we defended and restored peace in Syria", "the decision on the "Nord Stream-2"", "the whole world was frightened by our heavy weapons", "we got rid of Crimea".
The main failures are “conflict with Ukraine”, “conflict with the West”, “isolation from the world”, the study by the Public Opinion Foundation says.
Dubai government has completely gone paperless - all government services are now digital
Dubai government has announced a complete shift from paper-based record keeping to digital technology.
All state services to the population will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This was reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new era of digitalisation of all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully paperless government," said His Highness Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, Crown Prince of Dubai and Chairman of the Executive Council of Dubai, on Saturday.
Now, internal and external document exchange in all Dubai government agencies will be carried out only in digital form through special information platforms.
The introduction affected all sectors without exception: healthcare, utilities, police, municipal authorities, courts, and so on. The government also joined the initiative, as did many commercial entities.
The transition to an electronic government and the digitization of document circulation began in Dubai in 2018.
Over that time, as authorities estimated, 336 million sheets of paper have been saved, equating to 14 million hours of human labour and $353.8 million in monetary value.
Earlier, Moscow Mayor Sergey Sobyanin stated that electronic services save citizens 2 days a year.
Well, about the dates of birth and how many years the child is, this is already a farce, about the class and group in the kindergarten too.
I don't believe that such stretch marks can happen.
And if they do, then they clearly don't care about their family, including their own.
My mother, her two brothers and grandfather and grandmother lived on 3 Vladimirskaya, and there was only one floor without bars.
They first knocked on the door, then on the window, then decided not to be polite and broke the window and got in, but grandpa had a baseball bat, which they received.
They knew for a fact that there was someone at home.
Turkey car production and exports fall below 2020 levels
Turkey's car production and exports fell sharply in November as the lira depreciated.
As a result, the industry's performance for the first 11 months of the year was worse than last year, Bloomberg reports, citing data from the Turkish Automobile Manufacturers Association.
According to the association, 115,000 cars were produced in Turkey in November, which is 20% less than the previous year.
About 759,000 cars were exported, which is more than 25% less than the previous year's figure.
And if the automotive sector of Turkey demonstrated positive dynamics compared to the previous year in the first 10 months of this year, then in the 11 months of 2021, the production of cars was already 0.3% lower than the previous year's figure.
The reason for such a fall was a sharp weakening of the Turkish lira, which in November depreciated by 29% against the dollar.
This led to a decline in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 MSB subjects received a deferral of credit payments in 2021
First Deputy Prime Minister Alihan Smailov has spoken about the situation with the provision of benefits for small and medium-sized businesses, reports the correspondent of RIA Novosti.
"According to the Agency of the Republic of Kazakhstan for Regulation and Development of the Financial Market, in the current year, in accordance with the President's instruction of April 1, 2021, the Head of the Agency issued a decision on April 9, 2021, No. 127 "On Approval of the Procedure for Granting a Deferment of Loan Payments to Small and Medium-Sized Business Borrowers", Alihan Smailov wrote in his response to a parliamentary inquiry.
He reminded that the order provided for the provision of deferment of loan payments by banks and organizations engaged in microfinance activities until April 1, 2021, including individual entrepreneurs, in the period from April 1 to June 30, 2021.
The deferment period ranged from 30 to 90 days, at the discretion of the subject of the MSB.
The borrower's statement could have specified a different payment deferral period.
During the deferment period, the debtor’s claims and lawsuits were suspended, a notice of the need to repay the overdue debt was issued, and the creditor was required to pay commissions and other payments," the deputy prime minister noted.
In 2021, applications were received for deferral of payments on loans by 603 borrowers-subjects of MCBs, of which 553 borrowers-subjects of MCBs received deferral on a loan amount of 9.7 billion tenge.
131 subjects of the MFO submitted applications for deferral, of which 95 were granted deferral for a total of 105.8 million tenge," A. Smailov concluded.
Pulmonologist Puryasev suggested that people with weak immunity can easily tolerate the "Okmiron" strain
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may be able to carry the virus more easily than those with a strong immune response
Pulmonologist Sergei Puryasev explained why the “Omicron” strain of the coronavirus may be dangerous.
The cause lies in the conditions of the virus's emergence.
Scientists believe that "okmiron" originated in the body of an HIV-infected or immunocompromised person.
That is to say, the mutation did not encounter any resistance from the immune system.
As a result, he is more aggressive.
Because there was no response from the immune system, it became very fast.
Apparently, there are these spike proteins, thorns, maybe more than necessary, their antibodies were not cut during the mutations, pulmonologist Sergei Puryasev comments.
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may be able to carry the Omicron variant more easily than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong response of the body to anything, any infection, is not always good.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is what happens with pneumococcal infections, when young people in their 30s die, while the elderly in their 60s cough it off.
The immune response of a young person is completely inappropriate: where it was only possible to threaten with a finger, he hits like a cannonball at sparrows, concluded Sergey Puryasev.
The doctor also reminded that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the most unpleasant of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial or viral.
If the first treatment is very successful and quick, in the second case it is often possible to buy only the symptoms - hope for the body.
The first sign of developing pneumonia will be the onset of body intoxication - this is a temperature, weakness, malaise.
Respiratory symptoms then follow: difficulty breathing, chest tightness, and coughing.
Pain on the right or left side, or abdominal pain, can also be signs of a developing problem.
Meanwhile, in Russia, the vaccination of the younger generation aged 12 to 18 may begin by the end of the year.
A virologist, head of the gene engineering laboratory at MFTI, Pavel Volchkov noted that this category is very actively affected by COVID-19.
The more contacts a teenager has, the more likely they are to go to school.
This is the most socially active stratum, just like preschoolers, said Pavel Volkov, a virologist and head of the genomic engineering laboratory at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology (MIPT).
Huge thanks to the author for this article.
I was happy to refresh my memories...
Teath-In.
In those far-off 1970s and 1980s, no dance floor was complete without the music of this group.
And at home, when gathering with friends, they would dance to their music.
Immunologists have proposed a hypothesis as to why people with obesity are becoming victims of COVID-19
The authors studied the adipose tissue left over from bariatric operations and found that the fat cells, known as adipocytes, can be infected with the coronavirus.
The immune cells located in the adipose tissue, the macrophages, were also infected, and they showed a strong inflammatory reaction.
Scientists also examined the fat tissue of patients who died from COVID-19 and found coronavirus particles in the fat surrounding various organs.
It is known that HIV and influenza viruses can hide in fat tissue, using it as a reservoir in an attempt to evade the immune system's response.
It is likely that SARS-CoV-2 can do this as well.
A biologist has explained the causes of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semyon Goloshchekin named the causes of dementia and told about the ways of its prevention in an interview with the radio station Sputnik.
According to the World Health Organization, this disease affects more than 55 million people.
The syndrome manifests itself in a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, the person finds it increasingly difficult to orient themselves even in familiar surroundings.
Goloshchekin noted that the most common causes of dementia are neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression, and alcoholism.
At the behavioral level, factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive engagement can play a role," he said.
Harmful habits such as smoking, excessive alcohol consumption, disrupted sleep patterns and a sedentary lifestyle also contribute to the development of dementia.
Among the first signs of the expert, he noted forgetfulness, inability to concentrate and a decrease in the level of abstract thinking.
"There is a discussion that hearing loss can be an early sign of Alzheimer's disease or one of the risk factors for its development," the biologist added.
To prevent the development of the disease, the World Health Organization recommends maintaining a necessary level of cognitive load, training cognitive skills and abilities that require the involvement of memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the Department of Neurology, Neurosurgery and Medical Genetics of the FGBOU VSU RNMU named after.
N.I. Pirogov, head of the department of cognitive disorders at the Federal Center for Brain and Neurotechnology, Anna Bogolepova, told about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt returns about 30,000 illegally exported artefacts
Over the past 10 years, the Egyptian government has managed to return more than 30,000 artifacts that were illegally smuggled out of the country.
This was announced on Saturday, 11 December, on the Al-Hayat television channel by the head of the department of returned antiquities of the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, Shaaban Abdel Gawad.
Since 2011, the Egyptian government has managed to recover 29,300 artefacts.
Only this year, the Museum of the Bible in Washington discovered 5,300 ancient Egyptian artifacts," he said.
Abdul Gawad clarified that all the artifacts smuggled out of the country have been registered in the archives.
The department's employees are currently working to return them to Egypt.
In particular, experts "track auctions around the world and sales on the Internet" through foreign and Egyptian sites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector said that cultural artefacts are restored when they are returned, and then they are exhibited in museums.
One of the returned artifacts was a 20,000-year-old human skeleton discovered in Belgium, which is now part of the Egyptian Civilization National Museum in Cairo.
In 2020, Egyptian authorities reached out to Interpol to help find a bust of Pharaoh Tutankhamun that was sold at an auction in London.
Christie's auction house held an auction on July 4, at which a bust over 3,000 years old was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million rubles).
This has caused dissatisfaction in Egypt.
The Egyptian side also claims that the artefact was illegally removed from the Karnak temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
The head of Tutankhamun, depicted as the god Amun, was kept in a private collection and was not put up for auction since 1985.
How the relic ended up in Europe is unknown.
Egypt has been actively seeking the repatriation of antiquities illegally removed from the country at different times.
According to authorities, 95% of the contraband artifacts are the result of "black-market" archaeologists.
"The Crimean Tatars are not taken into account" - and this is correct, because the Crimean Tatars (232,000) are a separate people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, then only 42 thousand people - so many Tatars (Kazakhs) live in Crimea (see the census).
The Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
They are united only by the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants to access employees' personal mobile devices
Credit Suisse is demanding that its employees provide the bank with access to their personal mobile devices, according to the Financial Times.
The issue is that in Europe and the United States, the Swiss bank does not issue corporate devices to its employees, instead offering a discount on the purchase of a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner telecommunications operator.
According to current rules, the bank can monitor information on corporate devices issued to its employees, as these devices are used to resolve business issues with colleagues or clients.
The bank has the right to check mobile devices in extreme cases, for example, if an employee used it to conduct a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now, however, after many employees have switched to remote work, the bank wants to extend this rule to all devices used for work.
According to the newspaper, the bank's management has set a deadline by which employees can familiarize themselves with the new rule.
Credit Suisse has not commented officially on the new requirement.
Sontelle Vivre Dual royal 70x200 mattress.
The Vivre Dual royal mattress has a high-quality and durable block of TFK 18 autonomous springs in its center.
Natural coconut fibre layers add firmness, zonal latex distributes the load better, latex with Aloe adds hygiene to the sleeping area, and the relief foam relaxes.
A symmetrical medium-firm mattress with a height of 30 cm.
The product is delivered in a tightly wound roll and is ready for use after a short period of unpacking.
The cover is made from a strong tricot fabric with a lining on a comfortable layer.
The fabric of the cover does not wrinkle or stretch over time.
Part 4
The last year of Sergei Yesenin's life - 1925 - was fruitful in terms of creativity, but was a difficult time for the poet and his "ego."
He has already broken away from any literary associations, he is known, in demand, sometimes harshly criticized, even maliciously, but the reading public is ready to carry him on their shoulders.
More than 60 poems were written in a year, many of which are masterpieces, the Persian motifs cycle was completed, the poem Anna Snegina was written, 8 books were published, and the collection Rus' Sovetskaya was published.
And the main success was in the end of June 19th, when the Gosizdat publishing house signed a contract with Yesenin for the publication of his works in 3 volumes.
No one has been so honored by modern poets as Sergey Alexandrovich, he is the first!
Moreover, it promised very good money - the contract stipulated that the honorarium would be 1000 rubles per month for 20 months (for example, the plant director received 300 rubles per month, the engineer - 200).
The funds were needed as never before.
Esenin married the granddaughter of Leo Tolstoy, Sofya Tolstoy, and had to arrange the family life, take care of his sisters Katya and Sasha, and his mother.
It seemed like life was getting back on track, there was something to be happy about, but for him everything was tinged with dark tones, as if the nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published after Yessenin's death) had come to life:
My friend, my friend,
I am very, very sick.
I don't know where this pain came from.
It's the wind whistling
Over the barren and deserted field.
That is, as in September,
Alcohol poisons the brain.
Many of his acquaintances noted that Yezenin had done badly, looked bad, and was clearly ill.
More and more often, there are panic attacks and nervous breakdowns.
And the reason, probably, is not only alcoholism...
However, if the diagnosis of alcoholism was made to Sergei Alexandrovich by someone, there are no reliable documents left.
For example, in May 1923, when Yessenin, at the insistence of his fourth wife, the American Isadora Duncan, was improving his health in a clinic in Paris under the supervision of Professor Pyotr Gannushkin (Yessenin would meet him again two years later, in Moscow).
But there are plenty of testimonies of the poet's drunkenness, scandals on this subject, complaints to the police - scattered in dozens of memoirs.
Since the beginning of the 20s, the poet's terrible romance with the green dragon has been developing rapidly.
In the late summer of 1923, Esenin briefly moved in with his friend, the impressionist Ivan Starzhev.
Amazingly, Yevtushenko never had his own accommodation, even though he had very good earnings, he was always renting apartments, staying in hotels or with friends.
The veteran remembers:
"He only came to visit at night, and most of the time he was in an inebriated, drunken state.
Once, returning at four in the morning, Esenin fell on the staircase...
Falling, he scratched his face and wheezed.
When he came to his senses, he began to continuously cough, spraying blood all over the sheets..."
And Esenin himself admitted after his trip to Europe and the United States (then there was a dry law in the States, but Duncan brought with her a decent amount of alcohol) that:
"I didn't see anything there, except for cabbages and streets...
I've already forgotten people at this point...
And he did drink, of course...
And I drank because I was thirsty."
Pirelli Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tyre is based on a high-performance rubber and silica compound and provides long-lasting, effective performance, even wear, and load resistance.
The linear pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter protector tire, which forms ribs, guarantees low rolling resistance, steering stability.
Four deep grooves effectively remove water and dirt from the contact patch of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre, and suppress skidding and aquaplaning.
Skateboard 3D-lamination improves grip on slippery roads, snow and ice.
The large shackles of the shoulder zone increase the lateral grip of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyres during manoeuvring, enhance traction, and reduce braking distance.
Small channels and nooks keep the heat in.
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom 100x195
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom - modern interpretation of the budget model in the premium class line.
The foundation of the mattress is a block of independent double springs Duet.
A softer spring is inserted inside the larger spring.
This allows for the mattress to be evenly distributed.
Both sides of the mattress are filled with an artificial latex.
It's a natural latex substitute, but it's denser and more expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort of the mattress.
Artificial latex is hypoallergenic, meaning it doesn't absorb moisture or dust.
A mattress would suit a couple with a big weight difference (over 30 kilograms).
There is no wave effect here, where the light partner slides to the side of the heavy one.
The soft, pleasant to the touch cover made of practical jacquard Sense is made of a layer of synthetic fibre.
Natural fabrics do not accumulate static electricity.
It may be possible to manufacture this mattress in a rolled-up version (vacuum roll packaging).
Now my son is almost 16 and he no longer has the desire to hit.
All the energy is focused on choosing what he will earn his living from.
He's much more responsible than I was in his years or my husband, who had a few run-ins with the law before the wedding.
The father is caring for his young daughter.
And he loved, as Lermontov wrote, "with a strange love."
Why did the girl cry on the exam when she hadn't failed it yet?
Why he didn't tell his daughter that it wasn't a school.
She will have a tail.
Well, what?
He will re-take the exam.
Millions of students know this.
What are you talking about?
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus uses migrants as "weapons" against the EU
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus uses migrants as "weapons"
Poland's Deputy Foreign Minister, Pawel Jablonski, expressed the opinion that the President of Belarus Alexander Lukashenko used refugees as "weapons" against the European Union and intends to continue this "operation" next year.
The corresponding statement by the deputy head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs was made in an interview with the Australian Financial Review newspaper.
According to Yablonsky, the sanctions against Belarus temporarily “stopped Lukashenko”, but he “is actively looking for new ways”.
The Polish official also believes that illegal migrants will now be used as weapons "in many parts of the world."
As reported by the kp.ru website, the European Union has already introduced the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
He touched 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
In Europe, they have announced their readiness to expand the restrictive measures against the republic, "if the situation in the country does not improve."
In response, Minsk introduced a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that previously decided to impose sanctions on Belarus.
A 60x100 cm clothing cover, spandex, blue color.
To make your clothes last longer, you need to take good care of them.
Proper storage will extend the life of the item and keep it looking attractive.
We can help with this clothing cover!
Benefits.
By using a garment bag, you save a lot of space.
This is especially relevant if you have a lot of things and a small cabinet.
A pleasant appearance.
No more dresses, no more skirts and no more tops hanging all over the place.
Neatly folded clothes allow you to sort them and hide them from prying eyes.
For people who use shelves instead of a regular cabinet, this is the best option.
A dust cover protects clothing from dust, dirt, insects, mechanical damage or possible fading.
It does not allow clothing to change shape during long-term storage, prevents the formation of lumps.
The features of the clothing shirts.
The special material will allow your clothes to "breathe."
With careful handling, the service life of such a cover is not limited.
They can store not only clothes, but also bedding, pillows, and bed linen.
The cover is sealed with a strong lightning bolt.
It is important to remember!
First, prepare things for long-term storage: clean them, fold them out.
Choose the optimal size of the cover: things should not bend from the bottom.
It is not recommended to hang several bulky items in one pouch: they may get wrinkled.
If you value order and cleanliness, cherish your belongings, and want to keep them and extend their service life - order a garment cover.
Go to the large catalogue and choose the desired colour and size at a favourable price!
"Not by Snickers hat": when a velvet jacket turns a man into a laughing stock
At the 2021 social events, velvet blazers dominated.
Perhaps the first to announce his new fashion decision was Daniel Craig.
He appeared at the premiere of the film "It's Not Time to Die" in a velvet malachite jacket and a traditional "bondage" butterfly.
After his example, Prince William followed suit twice, first wearing a green velvet suit that did not match the royal dress code to the Earthshot Prize ceremony, and then choosing a more classic option for the Royal Variety event in support of the Royal Variety Charity.
A couple of weeks ago, the trend tried on Lionel Messi.
The footballer came to pick up the seventh "Golden Ball" in a Dolce & Gabbana velvet jacket.
By the way, his sons were dressed in the same way.
AliExpress has already noted a growing demand for men's velvet jackets in Russia.
According to the data of the Gazetru analytical service, their sales increased by 1.4 times.
The most popular are warm velvet jackets with a lining and a fitted silhouette, the main colours are dark beige, burgundy, dark blue and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is from 3 to 6 thousand rubles. Men prefer to buy only jackets - they choose suits less often.
They can be bought not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, velvet jackets are presented in almost all brands - and Brioni, Paul Smith, Etro and Saint Laurent.
The most desired model is the one by Gucci, in which Jared Leto, the brand's ambassador, appeared at one of the film "House of Gucci" premieres.
When choosing expensive-brand jackets, you can be sure that the velvet is made of silk.
Thanks to a special weaving technique, a dense fabric with a hairy outer texture and a smooth inner side is obtained.
Cheaper options are made of cotton or polyamide, but they last less.
Fashion expert Ilia Vakhushkin warns that in the case of the velvet jacket, the main thing is not its model or style, but appropriateness.
"Velvet requires evening light, so this jacket is ideal if you are going to a party or a formal event - explains Vakhoshkin. - It will also fit for those occasions when the invitation specifies a "Black Tie" or "Creative Black Tie" dress code.
Another important criterion, which allows you to make a choice in favor of a velvet jacket, is the status of its buyer.
“A man in a velvet jacket should first of all acquire a proper, well-to-do social circle, the authors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion “Krasavchik Bramblell” believe. “The owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the category of people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to attend themed social events, where the dress code is always specified.
Ilya Vakhoshkin suggests combining a velvet jacket with similar elegant items: classic trousers with studs, a plain shirt, a silk tie, loafers with tassels, and cufflinks.
Too simple and mundane things will look out of place.
Fashion experts from the "Brammall's Beauty" salon are sure that it would be inappropriate for a regular employee to appear in a velvet jacket at a corporate event, but if we're talking about "the leader among those who are running this event," then "yes," such an outfit would be appropriate.
If a lower-ranking employee's goal is to advance to a higher position in a complex company hierarchy or to get financial bonuses, then it is better not to wear a silk jacket.
Management will definitely assess this phrase as “not Senchenko’s hat”, the editors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion believe.
Very ambiguous feelings about the voice.
It's an unnatural sound, so strained.
And it has nothing to do with the cute face of the young girl.
To be honest, I don't understand the admiration of others.
But from the bottom of my heart, I wish you success in life!
It's all about the money - alternative energy is well lobbied, meaning it is paid for.
Billions of dollars.
Are they in sorrow?
No, electricity prices have risen.
Traditional energy is also not in demand - gas, oil and coal are being sold cheaper than they are now.
Wild demand for fuel.
A penny drops.
And who was on board at the time?
As usual, a regular buyer.
Are the problems of the Indians affecting the sheriff?
Therefore, it is not correct to consider Western politicians as idiots who have "missed" the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a good pay rise.
I didn't see one pretty person in the pictures in the article.
Just average for the average passenger.
Perhaps if such characters are so confident in their beauty that they decide to show it to the whole carriage, then they will not be approached, most likely.
But only because of their mental disorder and ignorance, and not because of their appearance.
Kazbek, "a slave who is aware of his slave status and is fighting against it, is a revolutionary.
A slave who does not recognize his slavery and lives in a silent, unconscious, and speechless life of slavery is simply a slave.
Rab, who sweats when he describes the delights of life as a slave and praises the good and kind master, is a slave, a scoundrel."
Immunologist says booster shots every 4-5 months will help protect against 'Omicron' strain of coronavirus
Vaccination four to five months later may protect against the new coronavirus strain "omicron".
Immunologist Nikolai Kryuchkov said that the six-month vaccination period, taking into account the emergence of a new strain, is “a very long period”
"Previously, such a period was normal, but now it is better to carry out the procedure within five months, and for people with chronic diseases - within four months," the expert said, calling for a parallel vaccination campaign with revaccination.
Kryuchkov also noted that early revaccination provides a good titer of neutralizing antibodies.
"If a person has received two vaccinations and a booster, or has recovered from an illness and been vaccinated, or has been vaccinated and recovered, then he has "hybrid immunity," meaning that he has a lot of antibodies and neutralizing antibodies," the expert explained.
"The Big Seven" warned Russia of "massive consequences" in case of an invasion of Ukraine
The "Big Seven" (the United Kingdom, Germany, Italy, Canada, the United States, France and Japan) have published a statement following the meeting of their foreign ministers in Liverpool.
It emphasizes that "military aggression" by Russia against Ukraine "will have huge consequences and will be costly" for Moscow, but specific measures are not described in the document.
"We, the foreign ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States, and the High Representative of the European Union, are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
The ministers then called on Russia to "de-escalate, use diplomatic channels and comply with its international obligations on transparency of military activities," as President Biden said during a video call with Russian President Vladimir Putin on December 7.
"We confirm our support for France and Germany's efforts in the Normandy format to achieve full implementation of the Minsk agreements in order to resolve the conflict in eastern Ukraine," the foreign ministers of the "Big Seven" also said.
Any use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited under international law.
Russia should not doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have huge consequences and a serious price in response," they warn.
We confirm our unwavering commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Ukraine, as well as the right of any sovereign state to determine its own future.
We welcome the restrained position of Ukraine.
We will intensify our cooperation in our common and comprehensive response," the statement also said.
Earlier in the day, British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss said that Russia would face "serious consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
According to her, this meeting showed the "unified voice of the "Big Seven" countries, whose share of the world's GDP is 50%, and which very clearly stated that the invasion of Ukraine will have huge consequences for Russia."
Pfizer vaccine found 32 times less effective against omicron strain
The Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine's efficacy against the omicron strain of the coronavirus is 32 times lower than against other strains of the disease.
The University of Hong Kong and the Chinese University of Hong Kong scientists came to this conclusion, reports South China Morning Post (SCMP).
The vaccine was deemed less effective based on a study of antiviral activity in people who received two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine.
"We see that most people had a high level of antiviral activity against the original Sars-CoV-2 variant, but this ability was significantly reduced against the omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris explained.
At the same time, scientists emphasized that vaccination remains the most reliable way of protection against the severe course of the disease caused by the coronavirus.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of a coronavirus pandemic taking into account the impact of the omicron strain.
The authors of the study concluded that the omicron strain may cause a new wave of circulation of the virus and an increase in mortality if additional measures are not taken.
The head of the Ukrainian Defense Ministry accused Germany of blocking the supply of NATO weapons to Kiev
The head of the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense, Alexey Reznikov, accused the government of former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking the purchase of lethal weapons by Kiev within NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on December 12, Reznikov reminded that in the previous month, Germany vetoed the purchase of Ukrainian anti-sniper systems and rifles for the destruction of drones.
At the same time, it is noted that later Berlin softened its position on rifles, recognizing them as lethal weapons.
According to the defense minister, Kiev intends to acquire the aforementioned weapons within the framework of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, the United States, Great Britain, Lithuania and France are mentioned.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the position of the new German government under Chancellor Olaf Scholz on the issue of arms deliveries to Ukraine remains unclear.
Earlier on Sunday, the Ukrainian ambassador to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, expressed the opinion that Kiev should not expect deliveries of weapons from Berlin under Chancellor Scholz.
According to him, the previous German government explained its refusal to provide weapons by the risk of military escalation of the conflict in Donbass, despite the "occupation of Russia" of part of the Ukrainian territory.
The diplomat is sure that Germany will maintain the same "illogical" position under the new chancellor.
In August, Ukrainian leader Volodymyr Zelensky said that Kiev expects assistance from Berlin in equipping the navy.
In Ukraine, it is expected that Germany will be a partner in the technical sense, the president added.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, the co-chair of the Green Party of Germany, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he called for the sale of Kiev's defensive weapons.
Sergey NOSOV 2, no, bad eyesight, no matter what.
"And" instead of "Е"?
To pass over commas in large numbers?
And write instead of write.
No, you are illiterate.
For the philologist, this is a disgrace.
Fishing game set: e/f light, sound, in complete set, 2 rods, 5 figures, 3AAA battery not included, base.
Electric fishing is a fun and useful toy for a child's development.
Playing, the child will be training fine motor skills of the hands, developing dexterity, precision, and attention.
It is worth turning on the toy, as 5 miniature fish will start to swim around the imitation pond to the cheerful melody.
The child's task is to catch them all!
You can play alone or in pairs: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy works from 3 AA batteries, 1.5 V (not included).
The game field (DxWxH) is 21x17x4 cm.
The product is made of plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
The winners of the Arsenyev Prize have been named in Moscow - Russian Gazette
A solemn ceremony of awarding the winners of the third season of the All-Russian Literary Prize “The Far East” in honor of
V. K. Arsenieva passed in Moscow.
As reported on the Instagram prize page, a total of 89 applications have been received by the organizing committee this season.
63 people passed the selection.
The leaders in the number of submitted works were Primorsky and Khabarovsk regions - 13 and 11 applications, respectively.
More than 60 works were submitted for the award in three categories: “Long prose”, “Short prose”, “Prose for children”.
Nine works made it to the shortlist - three in each category.
Alexander Filkin (Primorye Territory) won in the “Long Fiction” category with the book “Inscription on the Gospel”.
The award was presented to the winner by the Deputy Prime Minister - the Presidential Plenipotentiary Representative of the President of the Russian Federation in the North Caucasus Federal District, Yuri Trutnev.
In the “Short prose” nomination, the best was awarded Lyubov Bezbah (Sakhalin region) for the work “The Whisper of the Night Rain”.
She received the award from the Russian Minister of the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Aleksey Chekunkov.
In the “Children’s prose” nomination, the laureate was the Baykalian writer Nina Belomestnova and her “Golden Thread”.
The author was awarded the screenwriter, writer, candidate of philological sciences and chairman of the jury of the Andrei Gelasimov Prize.
All winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
As a reminder, within the “Far East” award, authors of the best works on the Far Eastern theme are awarded.
The main task of the award is not only to award winners and tell about contemporary authors, but also to attract cultural interest to the Far East as a priority development area of the 21st century.
Novels, short stories, collections of short stories or stories, as well as documentary prose and memoirs can be submitted for consideration.
In this case, the author’s place of residence is not important, what matters is writing in Russian.
The official website of the prize: https://arseenyeva-prize.ru/.
Skvoroda, d=22 cm, with handle, dark marble, 4278884.
The Kukmara "marble" dish is made of cast aluminium and is coated with an innovative anti-fingerprint marble coating based on water, reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
The features of the “Marmornaya” series of dishes.
The significant thickness of the walls and bottom excludes deformation of the body, guarantees durability, and provides the necessary strength of the coating.
A high-strength anti-slip marble coating on a water-based base is reinforced with ultra-hard mineral particles.
An environmentally safe anti-fouling coating without the presence of PFOA (perfluorocarbon acid).
Ideal heat distribution across the entire surface of the pot, long-lasting heat retention.
The possibility of using the minimum amount of fat.
The anti-corrosive marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exclusive durability of the coating during operation.
Small scratches and minor imperfections on the surface of the stove do not affect the properties of the anti-stick coating and the longevity of the cookware.
The products will not burn and retain their taste.
The possibility of preparing tasty and healthy food without adding oil, like on hot stones.
The bottom is thickened to 6 mm.
High thermal conductivity and ergonomics.
Ease of cleaning.
Suitable for all types of tiles, except induction.
You can wash in a dishwasher.
The wall consists of 6 layers, the inner coating is "marble".
A high-strength anti-adhesive coating based on water, reinforced with ultra-hard mineral particles.
The reinforced soil layer.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
The body is made of cast aluminium, up to 6 mm thick.
The external anti-glare coating is “marble”.
The Kukmara pot will allow you to turn an ordinary cooking process into a pleasant and easy-to-do activity for any housewife.
Years... I did the same thing a long time ago.
He combined the dining room with the kitchen.
The apartment is three-room.
Was.
Of course, the project, the permit, the new technical passport, everything according to the law.
In the living room, they made a bookshelf and a large wardrobe.
A door was opened in the kitchen, and a lot of space was created.
For almost 10 years of living in this apartment, we have never regretted the decision.
Instead of a bath, they installed a curved bathroom cabinet.
I regret this a hundred times!
I only recently realized that I love rum.
But the beautiful world of romance I have not yet opened for myself, except for "Barcardi" and "Captain Morgan".
What else would you recommend and from where could one start this wonderful acquaintance?
I also got a cold.
I won’t get vaccinated.
He arrived in Chernomorets for “rehabilitation”.
Only with the weather did not go well...
The houses are pretty, but normal birds won't want to nest in them because they attract a lot of attention, ornithologists say.
Plus paint and other chemicals will repel the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I will definitely try.
And where is Japan?
Thanks for the recipe.
What kinds of apples should be used in this recipe?
It's really good.
I add a little bit of chopped celery and a green apple.
Try it.
Recently, a zombie has declared that the production of cars is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A table appeared on the screen, showing which country produces what percentage of these semiconductors (presumably microcontrollers).
Russia was not on the list.
That's it!
In the United States, with their expensive workforce, it is profitable, while in Russia, it is not profitable!
And my stepmother would scold me.
I'm sorry, she's not with us.
If I had seen her better, things could have been different.
But besides hatred, gossip, and scandals, there's nothing to remember.
I'm sorry for her, she lived her life in anger.
Mercedes filed a protest against the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The German Mercedes team, whose pilot Lewis Hamilton finished second in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix behind Red Bull driver Max Verstappen, has filed a protest against the final result of the race, the Formula 1 press service reports.
Mercedes believes that the rules of Formula 1 48.12 and 48.8 were violated during the race.
In the first case, the German team challenges the decision of the judges to return the lap leaders to the race in one lap.
According to the second - Fertstapen overtook Hamilton in the allowed "restart" zone.
We will add that the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Verstappen overtook Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 world championship, is preliminary, as the Mercedes protests are not known
G7 warns Russia of responsibility for invasion of Ukraine
The G7 foreign ministers warned of "serious consequences" for Russia if it continued its military aggression against Ukraine, according to the final statement of the meeting.
The participants of the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of the Russian armed forces near the country's borders.
"Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have serious consequences and serious costs," the statement published on the British government's website says.
G7 and EU ministers said they were "united in their condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine."
British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss warned at a press conference in Liverpool about "significant consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
We have made it clear that any invasion would have significant consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to stop its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Earlier, at the summit in Liverpool, the G7 foreign ministers agreed that it was necessary to return to the negotiating table to resolve the crisis caused by the buildup of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine.
The talks were in the "Normandy format".
The North Atlantic Alliance also took part in the dialogue on Ukraine in the “Normandy format”.
Russian Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said that by calling on Russia and Ukraine to return to the negotiating table, the G7 countries "wrote themselves off as unable to take responsibility for their own mistakes."
The Homsu Diamond purse.
The Diamond belt bag is perfect for sports, travel or just for walks.
It's easy to take with you, it's roomy, made of durable and lightweight fabric.
The main department opens with a flash of lightning, which is easy to do even while walking.
Stylish and bright design will suit those ladies who really have a refined taste in accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19x12x7 cm and a belt length of 40 to 60 cm, which allows it to hold various things, from a passport to a mobile phone.
The material makes it easy to remove the belt pouch using various household items.
For convenience, you can use a special regulator for the strap size.
Ways to return stolen money through online stores have been revealed
There are several ways to get your money back from online stores that have been stolen, and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
Experts in information security revealed this to RBK.
To reduce the risk of large losses in the event of a data breach, it is recommended to store the main funds on the card or bank account that are not used for online shopping.
Some of the savings can be deposited in a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend setting up a separate card for online purchases.
If the money was stolen during a purchase at a store that does not use 3D Secure protection technology, you can initiate a refund procedure.
"In accordance with the rules established by payment systems, responsibility for unauthorized transactions carried out without the use of 3D Secure lies with the party in the payment chain that does not use the service," a representative of Promsvyazbank clarified.
An expert from the international payment provider Ecommpay, Arthur Zaremba, noted that the buyer has the right to file a complaint with the bank to dispute the fraudulent operation within 120 days after the purchase.
In addition, if the perpetrator used a card on online resources that did not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be disputed and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases, online stores themselves return the money to the customer if the order has not yet been sent to delivery.
On November 19, the member of the Public Chamber, the director of the Safe Internet League, Ekaterina Mizulina, reported that in 2021 alone, 11,000 appeals were received on various fraud cases: from the sale of fake documents to the theft of personal data.
According to her, an effective solution in the current circumstances could be the creation of a single window for complaints about online fraudsters.
Scholz arrives in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
The newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis at the Belarus border, the independence of the Polish judiciary, the buildup of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
While Scholz has stated his desire to maintain good relations between Germany and Poland for a long time, the leaders of the two countries expressed clear expectations of each other.
Polish Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki said he would be calling on Scholz to speak out against the Nord Stream 2 pipeline, which is intended to deliver Russian gas to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
According to Moravec, Russia can use the gas pipeline against Europe as a means of political pressure.
Germany, in turn, supported Poland's efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin said it would help Warsaw and Brussels resolve this crisis.
However, the Polish judicial system remains one of the reasons for the disagreements.
The European Court of Justice has fined Poland, ruling that the judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland refused to pay the fine and its highest court ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
The new German government, sworn in on Wednesday, despite the demands of Poland and the United States, has not taken on any public commitments to stop the Nord Stream 2 pipeline in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine.
U.S. officials told congressional aides that they have reached an understanding with Germany to halt the pipeline if Russia invades Ukraine, a senior congressional aide said on Tuesday.
German officials have not confirmed these reports, but Scholz warned on Wednesday about the consequences if Russia violates the border of Ukraine, and this position was confirmed by representatives of the "Big Seven" on Sunday.
Dmitry, look more carefully.
The view from the window is the same, the size of the window has not changed.
They removed the wall between the kitchen and the room, so you can see the second window partially.
In general, those who are not familiar with the initial planning are doubtful.
But I know such apartments very well and I can see how they have been re-planned very well.
Let it all work out well for them.
It always surprises me when they write about the means to clean the sink, the toilet, the shelves, the taps.
You wash them once a year at Easter, don't you? It's a shame to have to wash them.
Just don't let it get dirty.
Minzifra wants to give writers residencies
The future Fund for supporting Russian writers will receive federal property left over from the Union of Soviet Writers and the Literary Fund of the USSR.
The writer’s residencies will be created on this basis, the “Parliamentary Gazette” reported in the Ministry of Culture, which will be the foundation of the fund.
The Ministry of Digital Development is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of the Foundation for Supporting Russian Writers.
The explanatory note clarifies that the fund will be responsible for taking care of the buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union of Writers and the Literary Fund.
“A significant amount of real estate has been transferred to the ownership of the Russian Federation, which previously belonged to the Literary Fund of the USSR, including objects located in the writer’s village of Peredelkino, the Komarovo settlement in the Leningrad region, and others,” the “Parliamentary Gazette” newspaper reported in the press service of the Ministry of Finance.
The project stipulates that the Fund's statutes should state that it is "established for the purpose of promoting literary activity by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers."
"The creation of conditions for creative activity is understood to mean the creation of writer's residences in different regions of Russia, in which there would be comfortable conditions for creativity," the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications, and Mass Media explained to us.
520 rubles for one cut tomato?
The yeast leavened bread is literally a layer of dough from a 550-ruble package.
3 pieces of fish in a can for 570…
No, it looks, of course, delicious, but the price is simply outrageous.
It seems that the Belarusians have gathered all the rich people.
Doctors warn of risks of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19 and before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yarceva and Sergey Tokarev warned of the danger of uncontrolled use of anticoagulants after contracting the coronavirus infection COVID-19 and before vaccination against COVID-19.
A doctor-therapist, immunologist Irina Yarceva said that independent prophylaxis of the possible formation of clots after COVID-19 can provoke a stroke.
Yarceva explained that anti-coagulants are not for everyone, only if the patient has been hospitalized, has been in a hospital, and has complications.
The doctor prescribes anti-coagulants (blood-thinning drugs that prevent excessive formation of blood clots) based on indications.
She said that there is now a widespread panic - everyone is taking anti-coagulants one after the other and getting complications in the form of hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding into the brain).
The head of the UrO regional profile clinic, the scientific director of the Society of Specialists in Preventive Medicine, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Sergei Tokarev, told URA.RU in a conversation that Russians now often use anti-coagulants chaotically, even before vaccination against the coronavirus infection.
According to Dr. Tokarev, citizens believe in dubious advice on the Internet and start self-medicating.
There are such citizens who, a week before vaccination, start taking anti-coagulants on their own initiative.
And during the preliminary examination before the vaccination, doctors notice blood clots.
He stressed that it is extremely dangerous to take any medication without determining the cause of the appearance of any symptoms.
Potatoes are called a superfood to protect against hypertension
Studies have shown that regular consumption of this common and readily available vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of developing cardiovascular disease.
Potatoes are found in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and microelements that help the work of internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving blood circulation and lowering cholesterol levels, Semana reports.
Today, heart disease is the leading cause of early death.
To improve the situation, it is not only necessary to treat, but also to eat properly.
One of the helpers in such a situation will be a regular potato.
According to scientists, this root vegetable contains a lot of vitamins B1, B3, B6, as well as a very important vitamin C for the body.
In addition, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, and also riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
Microelements help to effectively work all internal systems of the body.
In addition to all this, the root fights natural age-related disorders in the body, contains a lot of beneficial for the digestive system fiber.
When taken regularly, it can become a prophylaxis for atherosclerosis and hypertension.
I had such a case.
The lady came to see the apartment.
I came from another city to show it.
The advert featured detailed photos and a description of the apartment.
She was very disappointed because there was no "nice" kitchen and no "nice" balcony.
Apparently, there's nothing to do, and she's just looking at other people's apartments, while people are wasting their time.
About 145,000 adolescents have been vaccinated with the first component of COVID-19 in Kazakhstan
Information on vaccinating teenagers, pregnant and breastfeeding women against coronavirus has been published in Kazakhstan, reports MIA “Kazinform” with reference to the MVK for the Prevention of the Spread of COVID-19.
Twenty people died of coronavirus and pneumonia in Kazakhstan in one day. There are 85 people in critical condition with coronavirus - the Ministry of Health of the RK. Most of the regions of Kazakhstan are in the "green zone" for coronavirus
As of 11 December 2021, 181,037 people have received the first component of the Pfizer vaccine, and 14,580 people have received the second component.
The first dose: adolescents - 144,613, pregnant women - 10,645, breastfeeding women - 25,779.
The second dose: teenagers - 10 690, pregnant women - 1 141, breastfeeding women - 2 749.
The plumber who found the money in the church wall will be paid $20,000
The plumber who found the money in the church wall in the American state of Texas will be rewarded.
The information was released in a press release by Crime Stoppers of Houston.
The incident happened at a large evangelical church in Lakewood, where pastor Joel Osteen promises prosperity and success to the faithful.
In November 2021, a plumber, Justin Coyle, repaired one of the church's toilets and discovered thousands of packages of money and checks hidden under insulation.
He gave the find to the church and, according to him, did not even receive a thank you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, "You know, Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand that you did and could have done," KPRC-TV quotes him.
It appears the find is related to a theft that happened at Lakewood Church seven years ago.
At that time, about 200,000 dollars in cash and 400,000 dollars in the form of checks were lost, which were stored in the church safe.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer any losses.
However, a reward of $25,000 was announced for information about the criminals.
Justin Cowell couldn't claim the reward as the deadline for the award had already passed.
Despite this, the non-profit Crime Stoppers of Houston, which previously offered a reward of $5,000 and later received $20,000 in donations from Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, it was reported that the police questioned pastor Joel Osteen about the money found in the church's wall.
Tanya, her words, her actions - that's what defines her as a "real person."
Therefore, her attitude towards her is negative.
And it's not that "she is financially significantly wealthier than all the writers," as they write here.
There are people who are richer, but not all of them behave so arrogantly, so provocatively, like this madam.
The Promtex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190x190.
Soft Cocos 1 orthopedic spring mattress.
The basis is the TFK block (256 springs per square meter).
Independent springs help to evenly distribute the load.
Coconut coir (material made from coconut palm fibers) is used as a filler.
Between the filler and the spring block are layers of felt.
Both sides of the mattress are above average firmness.
Jacquard Sense case: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The tissue density is 116 g/m².
Again, simply and deliciously.
She was looking for chicken recipes on your page.
We were given a chicken.
They raised her in their own household.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
I want to make it more appetizing.
I want to find a recipe for chicken baked in beer.
Have you tried that?
Somehow, I trust you more than just Internet recipes.
A new case of human infection with avian influenza virus has been reported in China
A new case of human infection with highly pathogenic H5N6 avian influenza virus has been reported in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station, citing a notice from the Hong Kong health authorities, TASS reports.
The 68-year-old resident of Huicheng District in the southern province of Guangdong was infected with the disease. He kept poultry in his home.
His condition is assessed by doctors as critical.
The first human infection with the H5N6 strain was reported in May 2014 in the southwestern province of Sichuan.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has reached 53.
In Brazil, citizens are required to present vaccination certificates when entering the country
In Brazil, a judge of the Federal Supreme Court of Brazil (STF), Luis Roberto Barroso, has ruled that visitors to the country must present a COVID-19 passport.
This is reported by CNN Brasil.
Citizens who have contraindications to vaccination are released from the requirement to present a vaccination certificate.
Also on the list of exceptions are those who have arrived from countries where there is evidence of the absence of a vaccine.
"The situation is even more serious if you consider that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year, pre-Carnival and Carnival parties, as well as other events, which means an increase in tourist traffic," Barroso noted.
Earlier, the Brazilian authorities required unvaccinated coronavirus patients to observe a five-day quarantine.
The full protection scheme against COVID-19 has been revealed
A virologist, a doctor of medical sciences, a distinguished scientist of Russia, Anatoly Altshtein, in a conversation with Ura.ru, revealed the scheme of complete protection from the coronavirus infection.
He said this could be achieved by introducing an injection and using a nasal vaccine.
When given intravenously, large amounts of antibody A are formed. When the vaccine is injected, this does not occur.
Antibodies A protect the mucous membrane, so the virus cannot enter the body.
And inside, after vaccination, we produce the most immunoglobulins G (antibodies).
And if you take both vaccines, you will get a lot of antibodies A and G. But there is no decision on double vaccination," the doctor explained.
The head of the Urals Federal District’s profilactologist, Dr. of Medical Sciences Sergey Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of using nasal vaccination in combination with an injection is the ability to stop being a carrier of COVID-19.
He added that this would help to ensure that the body's defence system is as strong as possible.
Earlier, the Minister of Health of Nizhny Novgorod Region David Melik-Guseynov stated that the new wave of the COVID-19 pandemic would lead to the spread of a new coronavirus infection among children.
According to him, such a picture is observed in other countries where the next wave of the pandemic has arrived earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I talked to my horse (he died a long time ago) like this - if you're willing to trade a warm home, feed, affection, love and games for a puddle of manure, then go ahead.
But the pesel was trained and even smart.
He chose my society and went home.
The video shows a technique that works in 90% of cases.
It wasn't taken from the ceiling, believe me.
I slowed down a lot of the owners so that they didn't run away with the dog, although they said that 200,000 run away (pomeranians), I took the dog by the hand and led it in another direction.
In the end, the "200 thousand" chose the owner, not the dog that ran away somewhere.
Mass protests against vaccination continue in Europe
More than forty thousand demonstrators took to the streets in the Austrian capital Vienna.
They expressed dissatisfaction with the restrictive measures and the government's plans to make vaccination against COVID-19 mandatory.
From February next year, people who are not vaccinated will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
The Spaniards, outraged by the policies of the government in the health sector, held a peaceful march in Madrid.
Some held placards with the message "This is a false pandemic", "I will not be vaccinated."
A large protest against the sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, a COVID-19 certificate is mandatory for access to bars, restaurants, sports halls, nursing homes and night-time entertainment venues.
The decision to introduce sanitary passports was taken in the wake of an increase in the number of coronavirus cases.
More than a thousand protesters in Luxembourg protested against the tightening of restrictions and QR codes.
The protest began peacefully, but then turned into clashes with the police.
A group of protesters began throwing stones at the police.
In response, law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolay S. does not even have a consensus in Wikipedia on this matter.
Kashcheva-Rudneva is also listed as “the first Russian doctor, doctor of medicine,” probably because she started studying earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve that title.
Only one agrees with Zakharova: Americans only brought death and destruction to any country where they appeared.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetrical mattress made of natural coconut coir on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is firm, with layers of natural coconut on both sides.
The core of the mattress is a block of independent TFK springs.
Independent springs help to evenly distribute the load, help the body to take on its natural shape.
The natural cocoa is hypoallergenic, hygienic, with excellent air circulation.
The natural Jacquard cover is thick, durable, and pleasant to the touch.
It's sad and lonely to age alone, but it's inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad to read about it.
A person should live as long as they can take care of themselves and not be a burden to anyone.
All the best.
WHO has detected 'omicron' in more than 60 countries
The World Health Organization (WHO) said that the new coronavirus strain "Omicron" has already been detected in 63 countries.
Several experts have already said that the spread of the new strain could have catastrophic consequences.
The rate of spread of the strain was reported by the WHO.
As of December 9, the strain has been identified in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it has been actively spreading only since the end of November.
The WHO also expressed concern about the rapid spread of the new variant of the coronavirus.
Experts at the World Health Organization (WHO) expressed concern that the new strain, according to preliminary data, may surpass the degree of spread of the "delta" strain, also known as the Indian variant of the coronavirus, which currently leads in all countries without exception.
Before that, Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, the director-general of the World Health Organization, said that the omicron strain can have a significant impact on the course of the coronavirus pandemic.
The same conclusion was reached in the UK as well.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that "omicron" will overtake "delta" in the coming months.
But the number of those infected only in Britain will be around 1 million. This is despite the fact that officially "omicron" is currently infecting a few hundred people in the country, and according to estimates, up to 10 thousand.
British experts predict tens of thousands of deaths from the "Omicron" strain, and more than 2,000 people will be admitted to hospitals daily at its peak.
The British health service will not be able to cope with this.
The situation is complicated by the fact that according to the latest research, the effectiveness of the vaccine developed by Pfizer-BioNTech against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower than that of other types of disease.
How the Russian “Sputnik V” will react to the “Omicron” remains unknown - this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has only just begun testing the Russian vaccine on the “omicron” strain.
Why do we need to see the stages of ageing?
It would be better to see the execution of your exercises in more detail.
I don't understand the first exercise, how to do it: sitting on your feet or standing on your knees, as written, but how then to push your arms against your hips?
Or hands on the waist?
Interesting Belka, you're right, the Internet is a completely different thing, it's easy to talk to each other and it's easy to talk to each other, but when you meet in person, you can't say anything.
And to see a person, perhaps, is not what you expected, it didn't grab you - that's where the attitude comes from.
When he meets his man, then the views will change.
And again, Soviet time is called “the devil’s time”.
Then people believed in God more sincerely than they do today.
And they were raised practically according to God's laws (love for one's neighbor, not stealing, etc.).
What is the ideology today - money at any cost.
The Globe of Faith is a bit of a myth (it doesn't even exist), but even if it did, the time of the beast has come in the 90s...
Our Petersburg, or rather, Leningrad communal apartment with Big Zelenaya still supports communication.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we try to maintain a warm relationship between the older generation.
Maybe it's because there were no foreigners in the apartment, the rooms were not rented out, and the block brotherhood was not cancelled.
Unfortunately, we see more and more funerals.
Lara Angelskaya, get out!
Human babies, especially males, are strong, mobile, energetic, playful, push, wrestle, fight, just like their little "cousins" in the wild!
Only that they're not as soft as puppies or kittens, so bruises, bumps and scratches are common, and there's no such thing as a boomerang!
And why?
Did the brother push, without calculating the force?
But you are always so cunning that you never accidentally hurt anyone and never injured yourself?
SkySleep Wave Space BS 150x185 cm mattress.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BS) spring mattress has moderate firmness on both sides.
The comfortable layers of the mattress are a combination of coconut shell and artificial latex with a relief surface - ErgoFoam.
The cover is made of cotton, the fabric is jacquard.
It is strong, durable, and at the same time allows air to pass through it, which does not interfere with the ventilation of the mattress.
The cover is made of synthetic leather, which gives it a softness.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
The coconut has antimicrobial properties, it is hard and evenly distributes the weight that falls on it.
An artificial latex with a cellular surface provides a mattress with a micro-massage effect.
Durable materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnel block, in which springs are connected to each other, is characterized by reliability, it can withstand large loads and is suitable for couples with a small weight difference.
The perimeter of the product is reinforced with a PPU-made box - it extends the service life of the mattress, protects the springs from deformation along the edges.
Israel's Prime Minister Bennett announced the start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Ministry of Health will begin an emergency campaign to increase vaccinations from Sunday.
Since the morning of December 12, vaccination against coronavirus has been carried out in schools throughout Israel.
The Prime Minister of the Jewish state, Naftali Bennett, stated at today's cabinet meeting that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose of citizens at risk will also be studied.
In Israel, mass vaccination of the population against the coronavirus infection COVID-19 began on December 20, 2020.
Israelis are being vaccinated with the Pfizer vaccine.
Since January 10 last year, vaccinated people have been receiving their second dose.
The vaccination of 12-15 year olds in this country started in the beginning of June this year.
Currently, more than 5.78 million people have received both doses of the vaccine, and more than 4.12 million citizens have received the third dose.
Anna Gauer, well, probably a flea won’t get caught in the trap, it’s PAUCOOBRAZMO, as Lyalya put it.
In any case, I don't see any fleas.
But I'm curious, is it really there?
He needs something else to tempt him
Dimax Genius 70x190 children's mattress
A children's two-sided natural latex and natural coconut coir mattress on an independent EVS500 spring block.
A latex and coconut-fibre children's mattress on an independent spring block.
Natural latex is a soft, elastic material that is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic, and has excellent properties, making sleep as comfortable as possible.
The reverse side of the medium-firm mattress is made of natural coconut fiber and latex.
The core of the mattress is a block of independent springs.
The springs are arranged in such a way as to distribute the load evenly over the mattress surface, supporting the body in a natural position.
A great option for schoolchildren and teenagers.
The cover is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant, and does not wear out.
Seven people died in Brazil as a result of floods
At least seven people were killed and 175 injured in the powerful rainstorms that hit the northeastern Brazilian state of Bahia and the neighbouring state of Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS with reference to rescue services.
An extratropical cyclone is raging across these states from midweek, resulting in rainfall totals of up to 450 mm in the region. In 25 municipalities of the state of Bahia, a state of emergency has been declared, and in some of them, the floods have been the worst in 35 years.
Several bridges were destroyed, two river dams were destroyed, and traffic was blocked on three routes.
According to the rescuers, about 5,700 people were left without a roof, and another 6,700 had to leave their homes.
The damage from the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents of the region.
Nika Lerman, I know Levomekol ointment, I work with medications.
It does a good job of treating inflammation.
Personally, I prefer Bepanten for surface wounds and burns, but you can see better what is more effective on the spot.
The main thing is that the healing process is going, such a hole was, just a mess.
Hola, España, You didn't hear or understand me.
I will answer with the lines of M. Isakovsky: “Migratory birds fly over\nThe past summer is looking for.
They fly to hot countries,\nBut I don't want to fly,\nI'll stay with you,\nMy native land!
I don't need another person's sun,\nI don't need another person's land."
And believe me, the photos from the park where I skied or my city will not be any worse.
By the way, it would be much more interesting to see your wonderful house with its interiors.
MAPED (France) Color'peps Twist, 12 colours, twist-up, in plastic case.
A set of 12 bright wax crayons in a plastic case with a twist-off lid.
They don't break, they don't get dirty, they are absolutely safe.
They don't require sharpening.
The body is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-pack: package with a lightning bolt closure.
$135 billion went into apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, user spending in apps worldwide grew by 25%, and downloads grew by 8%.
The most popular video services in the world turned out to be various.
The most popular video editor was CapCut, and the most money was spent on YouTube.
And the number of app downloads and user spending showed a significant increase over the period from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads has increased by 8%, reaching 140 billion. User spending in apps has also increased significantly, by 25%, to a record $135 billion.
The analytical company App Annie published data on the mobile app market in 2021, presenting a report on the market.
In 2021, the global economy emerged from lockdown and began a post-pandemic recovery.
"Will such a "return to physical" growth in the economy slow down? Absolutely not," the authors of the report say.
India is the leader in the number of app downloads: it accounts for about 20% of all downloads.
Behind her are the United States (9%) and Brazil (8%).
Gadget users on iOS spent more than Android users: 65% of all app spending was on iOS.
Among the applications, CapCut, a video editor, took first place in terms of the number of downloads in 2021.
Following him are two Indian apps: video service MX TakaTak and the online shopping app Meesho.
Telegram also ranks in the top 10 in terms of the number of downloads.
In general, judging by the number of downloads, VPN services are popular among users (two of them, VPN Master and NightOwl VPN, are in the top 10), as are services related to creating and broadcasting video (in addition to CapCut and MX TakaTak, two more such services are in the top 10 - Moj and SnackVideo).
"Users spent the most time in apps for live streaming and online streaming," the authors of the report noted.
YouTube leads here, with TikTok, Disney+, and HBO Max also in the top five for user spending.
Telegram, Instagram, Zoom and TikTok occupy the first places by the number of monthly active users, and the mobile version of Microsoft Office closes the top-5.
In Russia, the leader in the number of downloads for the year was the shopping app AliExpress.
Behind him are the Zenly service, which shows the location of friends, and the same CapCut.
Also in the top 10 are: online karaoke StarMaker, online clothing retailer Shein, Minecraft PE Maps app, online taxi ordering service DiDi, Pure Tuber YouTube client, Dixi retail app, and online scooter store Samokat.
People all over the world have adapted to the pandemic by moving to a mobile lifestyle, which can be considered one of the main takeaways.
The industries that have achieved the greatest success have been those that have helped people to be closer, both virtually and in person," App Annie's head of marketing research, Lexi Sidow, commented on the report's findings.
The mobile games sector generated $90 billion in revenue in 2021. The leaders in terms of downloads were casual and hyper-casual games, which have no or almost no plot, and the video design is minimal.
The top three most popular games in the world are Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race.
DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls and Phone Case DIY are the top games in Russia.
Previously, App Annie presented its forecast for 2022.
Among the main trends for next year, analysts at the company named the growth of the number of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the growth in popularity of the Generation Z generation of financial apps, such as the Robinhood investment app, and the further growth in popularity of metaverse mobile games.
Clan De File dog treats with beef, 30 pieces, 40 g each.
A natural, freeze-dried dog treat for all breeds and ages made from beef.
Clan De File is dog meat for dogs with beef, and nothing else.
All-natural, freeze-dried dog treats for all breeds and ages.
Only one type of protein is used in the preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of food allergies, so the treat is perfect for dogs with sensitive digestion and prone to allergic reactions.
The main ingredient of the delicacy is a meat fillet processed in accordance with human grade quality standards, which are used when preparing food for humans.
Recommended daily ration: no more than 10% of the animal's daily ration.
Energy value: 407 kcal.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Nutritional value: protein 57%, fat 17%, ash 4%, moisture 20%.
Russians warned about new scam scheme
The perpetrators began to look for new tricks for fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this with reference to experts.
According to the director of products at Ivideon, Zaur Abutaliyev, the main danger associated with the spread of video communication tools is deepfakes.
In this case, the scammers create a fake video based on real recordings with the victim's participation.
Thanks to this, it is possible to accurately reproduce the peculiarities of the behavior of a particular person.
Abutaliyev added that using a deepfake, cybercriminals can call a victim's acquaintances via video call or create a video with a copy of a person for distribution with the aim of extortion.
"Such fakes can easily provoke bullying because a skilled perpetrator can put people in embarrassing, dangerous or compromising fake scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis system engineer Alexander Vetkol also noted that psychologically, people are more likely to trust others when they see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the event of video-based technologies.
David, I will add.
What I wrote above was that I focused on the fact that all of this was bought in a small town where the local mentality did not allow for much make-up or short skirts, stockings and knee-high socks.
It's a province, but there was such a product in the store.
In big cities and in Muslim countries, women would get their make-up done and show off their lingerie.
That's how it is in Dushanbe, it's a big city, the capital of the republic.
There are many trends, but there is no such makeup.
Five actions to help avoid diabetes
High blood sugar levels are one of the most common problems in the world.
However, some do not attach much importance to this, and that is a mistake.
Diabetes can eventually lead to serious complications and even death.
Preventive measures play a major role in preventing the formation of diseases.
For example, doctors recommend changing the diet - reducing the number of different drinks and switching to plain water positively affects metabolism.
Sugary foods raise blood sugar levels to dangerous levels when eaten in excess.
Therefore, the first step on the path to a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and keep them at home.
The appearance of the disease is not only affected by improper nutrition, but also by habits.
To reduce the risk of diabetes, it is necessary to move a lot.
Experts recommend following a low-carb diet.
Such a diet not only helps to reduce weight, but also protects against sharp fluctuations in sugar levels.
To protect against diabetes, it is necessary to eat a lot of fiber.
Dietary fibers fill the stomach and thus contribute to the feeling of satiety, the secretion of digestive juices and the absorption of food.
Seeds of tomatoes GAVRIL PINK BUSH F1 0.10 g, article number 4241014.
A low-growing early beef tomato with abundant fruit for growing in the open ground and under temporary polythene covers.
The plant is determinate, with short internodes.
The fruits are large, rich in pink color, quite dense, weighing 180-210 g, protected from sunburn by leaves, well stored.
The meat is tender, with a sweet taste.
The hybrid is resistant to a complex of diseases.
It is recommended for making salads, appetizers, and slicing.
Planting in the nursery: at the end of March - beginning of April.
The trick is in the first true leaf stage.
Planting out the seedlings in the greenhouses is in May.
After landing in the open ground, the plants form and are tied down.
MK Slavda FC-160.
This freezer has an A energy efficiency class, which means it consumes significantly less electricity when in use.
The freezer is suitable for both a private home and an apartment thanks to the use of high-quality low-noise compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera works quieter than a regular refrigerator.
The quick freezing function freezes the products in the shortest possible time, preserving the maximum amount of useful substances.
The Slavda FC-160 freezer trailer complies with the climatic class N/ST, which allows it to work without problems at a room temperature of up to +38 degrees.
A digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Doctor Pavlova spoke about the “weekend migraine” of workaholics
Several factors can contribute to worsening symptoms over the weekend
The reason for the worsening of the patient’s condition after working days is often a “weekend migraine”, endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior researcher at the Faculty of Fundamental Medicine of Moscow State University, scientific director of the Clinic of Systemic Medicine Zhorzh Pavlova wrote in her Telegram channel.
According to her, especially often this affects workaholics, who experience headaches, dizziness and weakness in their free time.
Dr Pavlova noted that in addition to the accumulated fatigue over the past week, there are many objective reasons for the negative reaction of the body to changes in conditions.
On weekends, our lives are completely changed.
"We sleep long, all day we lie on the sofa, we probably eat more and drink less - the doctor argued. "Due to the lack of coffee, there is a small break.
Because of overeating and lack of water - heavy and broken."
The late rise is also an important factor.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you will experience a reaction called jet lag.
It occurs to travelers who cross several time zones.
To determine which factor is playing a decisive role in worsening the patient's condition, Pavlova recommended tracking what changes the most on weekends.
Mattress Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 130x185.
The reinforced perimeter made of high-density foam significantly increases the service life of the mattress.
The "Optimal Hard S1000" mattress has different firmness sides, the overall height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum load on one sleeping place is 140 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is housed in its own tissue pocket, which allows for proper body load distribution.
To protect the spring block, an insulating layer of wool was added, which separates the mattress fillers and springs.
On one side of the mattress is a layer of coconut coir 2 cm thick, which adds extra firmness and durability to the mattress.
A jacquard made of 2-cm-thick artificial leather and a 1-cm-thick material called Hollcon provides additional comfort.
On the other side, the mattress has a layer of coconut fibre 1 cm thick and a layer of wool.
The fabric has been treated with a special anti-bacterial Sanitized (Sweden) treatment.
The impregnation provides complete destruction of mold spores, does not allow the development of microorganisms, dust mites and microbes.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning, as well as air vents for additional ventilation of the layers.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine against omicron is ineffective
South Africa says Pfizer vaccine against omicron is low-efficacy
South African scientists have conducted a study and reported the low effectiveness of the Pfizer vaccine against the omicron strain of the coronavirus.
According to estimates, it (the level of neutralization of "omicron") corresponds to (the level of) the effectiveness of the vaccine against the infection with symptoms, which raises doubts about the ability of the vaccine to protect against infection, the text of the study published on the MedRxiv portal says.
At the same time, experts clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Earlier, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the omicron strain of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in the UK with more frequent hospitalizations than a year ago.
How much hidden sugar is in common products?
Sugar is not a good source of nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes, as well as cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that a hidden sugar may be listed under an unfamiliar word in a product's ingredient list - an ingredient that is similar in calories, composition and glycemic index to sugar.
The label may contain several dozen names, in essence, referring to sugar.
Some of the most common and frequent names are glucose and fructose.
Other invert sugars include dextrose (a sugar derived from corn), levulose (fruit sugar), molasses (blackstrap), agave syrup, and so on.
These are all simple sugars, which belong to the monosaccharides and disaccharides, and they can be found in confectionery products, as well as in ketchup, doctor's sausage, bread, and so on.
Roskachestvo state that the most effective way to reduce sugar consumption is to eat whole and unprocessed foods, and to pay attention to the label and the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar differ in taste, but whatever the ingredient is in the product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it is still sugar.
It is not easy to count the exact amount of sugar, as it is necessary to take into account not only the amount of sugar indicated by the manufacturer on the packaging, but also the fact that vegetables, fruits and so on contain a certain amount of sugar.
As a result, the total amount of sugar may be significantly higher than indicated on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose importance for Germany in 25 years
The new German Chancellor Olaf Scholz said that the import of gas is losing importance for Germany as the country continues its transition to a decarbonized economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045, becoming a climate-neutral country.
"In other words, in 25 years, the world will be such that the question of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role," the chancellor said.
Scholz noted that Germany continues to be committed to the fact that Ukraine is transporting Russian natural gas and in the future, as this resource is currently of great importance for the energy transition.
He recalled that Germany and the United States had made a statement in which they had confirmed Berlin's support for Ukraine's energy transformation.
Previously, the head of the German Foreign Ministry, Annalena Baerbock, stated that the certification process for the “Nord Stream 2” gas pipeline is ongoing.
According to the minister, during the coalition negotiations and the discussion of the coalition agreement, it was stated that energy projects should be subject to European energy law.
The diplomat also noted that the pipeline "does not meet the requirements" of the European Union.
Thanks for the interesting photos!
In 1985, it was necessary to travel to those regions.
I remember the ChMEZ rising up the Kanatschikov station hill, past the old building (resembling a centralization post, two-story), along the Kanatschikov street, and turning right onto Vavilov street to the factory gates...
Hackers break into Twitter account of Indian PM
Hackers have breached the Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
The attackers managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India allegedly recognized Bitcoin as a legal payment method, and that the country had already purchased cryptocurrency.
Modi's office was asked to ignore new messages.
The Prime Minister's office said Twitter reacted quickly - the account was restored.
The page was hacked in 2020 and called for donations to be made to the fund using cryptocurrency.
A referendum in New Caledonia saw a majority vote against independence
The third referendum in New Caledonia, held on December 12, ended with the same result as the previous two.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12, at noon, the majority of New Caledonian residents voted during the referendum against the independence of their territory.
At the same time, the level of participation in this third vote was significantly lower than in the previous two.
According to preliminary results published by local authorities, 3.51% (2,755) of those who voted voted in favour of independence for New Caledonia from France, while 96.49% (75,762) voted against.
Turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 residents of New Caledonia taking part in the elections.
As the agency France-Presse comments, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt," as supporters of independence urged voters not to vote.
As initiators of the referendum, they opposed its holding on December 12, considering that a new outbreak of the COVID-19 epidemic on the archipelago prevented a full-fledged and "honest" election campaign.
Thus, this abstention opened the way to a third victory for the supporters of French New Caledonia, after the referendums held in November 2018 and October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of the population voted against independence, and in 2020, 53.3%.
The separatists said they would not recognize the results of the last vote and would challenge them at the United Nations.
As reported on Sunday, December 12, in the Élysée Palace, President of France Emmanuel Macron is expected to speak about the results of this referendum.
The theme of New Caledonia's independence has revived the French presidential campaign in recent weeks.
Several presidential candidates have voiced support for keeping the territory within France, saying it is "the last outpost of the European Union in the Pacific Ocean."
"New Caledonia must remain French," repeatedly reiterated Eric Zemmour.
The Republican candidate Valérie Pécresse, who published a column in Le Figaro at the end of October, called on the Caledonians to remain French.
On his part, Emmanuel Macron announced in May 2018 that he would not take a position "because it is not his responsibility."
However, the president added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, on his part, expressed "a strong desire for the Caledonian choice to be a French choice."
Hey, what's up?
I've been a bit... I'm still a bit awkward, I'm still embarrassed.
Thank you for not turning away from my channel.
On the topic: I'm not an artist, I love to draw, but I end up with inspired menstrual blood.
But as an artist - not as an artist: what could be changed here?
Just remember that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as common as it is now.
But medicine was at zero - leeches, garlic and infusions.
Now they would put you on your feet in a minute.
And the food has nothing to do with it.
In Turkey, they tested the world’s first drone with a laser weapon
Successful tests were carried out in Turkey on the first in the world drone with a laser weapon.
The “Eren” UAV was tested at a distance of 100 to 500 meters, reports “MIR24”.
The device is capable of neutralizing explosive objects at a distance using a laser.
The new model’s maximum flight altitude reaches 3,000 meters.
After passing the relevant tests, the UAV will be put into service with the Turkish military, who will use it to destroy explosives without the need for sappers.
The agency notes that Turkey is one of six countries in the world capable of developing and producing their own drones.
I cut the steaks.
Salt, sugar, black pepper and dried herbs.
Sometimes he added cloves, they don't bother.
In a deep bowl, he covered it with a plate.
Well, that's how it is.
And why do I need this soy, for such money, I don't know what kind of fish it is, but the sturgeon is an excellent fish.
Bread, butter, and butter.
A sloppy sandwich.
WSJ readers criticize Russia-US relations article
Wall Street Journal readers have criticized a piece by Professor Christopher Harthwell in which he described his vision of relations between Russia and the United States.
The author expressed concern that the West is allegedly sacrificing Ukraine to Russia.
In his article, he convinces readers of the danger that comes from Moscow and made a number of derogatory remarks about Russian President Vladimir Putin.
At the end of Hartwell, he called on the West to "stand together as one front against Russia."
WSJ readers expressed their disagreement with the professor's position.
“There is a lot of false information in this article,” one of the readers quotes RIA Novosti’s comment.
"Europe is not ours to lose, and Ukraine is not our land.
The United States and NATO allies will never go to war with Russia over Ukraine," another noted.
Patches can also be applied to the lips.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch is a high-tech hydrogel that provides increased absorption and delivery of high-concentrated natural plant essence to the skin, adheres tightly to the skin and gives a feeling of freshness.
When applied to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the accompanying loss of moisture and allows the essence to penetrate deep into the skin layers.
SONEX 2085/EL LED Lamp with PDU Nores
The 2085/EL series NORES lamp consists of a metal base (base) and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser material is high-quality white matte acrylic, which provides the lamp with uniform diffusion and good light transmission.
The shape of the plinth: square, in the form of a relief ornament with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent points that give the included lamp a beautiful "starry twinkle" and iridescence effect.
The IP43 degree of protection allows the luminaire to be used in certain areas of wet rooms.
The kit includes a replaceable LED module with lenses, with a power of 72 W, which corresponds to a 520 W incandescent lamp.
And also the DUK panel, which allows for smooth colour temperature changes from 3000 to 6000K, brightness adjustment, switching to warm/white/cold/night light modes.
Urjazh Mask for the face moisturizing thermal night 50 ml.
An ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types with a fresh, rested and glowing complexion in the morning!
The real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
It tones, smooths the skin's texture and restores the skin's barrier.
A very pleasant water-gel texture with no stickiness.
A great after-sun care for the skin!
It is hypoallergenic.
An earthquake of magnitude 5.2 occurred in the area of the Kuril Islands
A 5.2 magnitude earthquake occurred near the Kuril Island of Shikotan.
It is noted that the epicenter of the earthquake was located 231.8 km northeast of the city of Severo-Kurilsk.
The crater was located at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded an earthquake of magnitude 7.5 in Peru, during which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make his way in the world, it is unknown where his petty-bourgeois mind would have taken him.
It's great when you come to America as a known person.
And you were born there, for what reason would you fight?
So why did he water the dirt, the bile, and the poison of the building with a justice that no one has yet invented.
Ukraine will start producing new generation of air-to-air missiles
The new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will start creating the ANKA type of reactive unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs).
On December 11, an anonymous adviser to the head of the Ukrainian president’s office, Aleksey Arestovich, reported on this.
In other words, they are capable of acting against air targets, against other drones.
Even against piloted aircraft.
They will have Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the body and so on," Dialog.ua quotes him as saying.
Commenting on the main features of the ANKA drones, Arsentyev explained that these are not piston-engine drones, but rocket-powered ones.
According to him, this new generation of drones surpasses Bayraktar in all respects.
The first batch of UAVs should be produced by the plant at the end of the next year, Arestovich said.
The ANKA drone was created by the Turkish Aerospace Institute in February 2014.
The development of the drone was carried out by the Turkish authorities in collaboration with a number of private companies since 2010.
The Ukrainian General Staff previously classified data on the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems during military operations by the combined forces in Donbass.
On December 6, President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky reported that the construction of a factory for the production of modern military unmanned aerial vehicles had begun in the country.
According to him, Ukraine is planning to use drones.
On September 29, Bayraktar Savunma and the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense signed an agreement to build a center in the Kyiv region, where personnel training, testing, and maintenance of Turkish Bayraktar UAVs will be conducted.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader's office called the memorandum a "big real step forward."
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions escaped from the Changi Airport in Singapore.
This is reported by The Straits Times.
The two predators managed to escape from a container with seven lions, which had arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it is unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions lay down on the roof of a container.
They couldn't get away from him because of the protective fence that was set up nearby.
The confrontation ended after the arrival of staff from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which manages all the Singapore zoos.
They have immobilized the lions with tranquilizer darts and plan to transport them to a quarantine facility.
Earlier it was reported that in the capital of Cambodia, Phnom Penh, a lion escaped from its owner and wandered the streets of the city.
On the same day, the animal voluntarily returned home, and no one was hurt.
Experts warn of cancer threat from B9 vitamin
Research suggests that an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, can lead to cancer.
The Daily Express has reported this.
Experts say there is strong evidence that people who do not have a folic acid deficiency are less likely to develop certain types of cancer, in particular colorectal cancer.
However, an overdose of the necessary dose can promote the growth of cancer cells.
University of Alabama Birmingham professor of dietetics Beth Kitchin advises tracking the amount of folic acid consumed throughout the day.
The optimal dose is 400 micrograms per day.
Cancer risk increases only if there is a significant deviation from this figure in either direction.
Kitchin recommends not taking B9 vitamins in tablets without a doctor's recommendation, to carefully monitor the dosage and avoid milk and other food products that contain folic acid.
Earlier, nutrition consultant Rachel Fine called folate a substance that slows aging.
Since it is also found in avocados, Fine recommended that men over 50 eat this fruit more often.
In the UK, by April, about 75,000 people may die due to the omicron strain
British scientists predict that up to 75,000 people could die in England in the next five months due to the spread of the omicron strain of the coronavirus, unless the restrictions are tightened in the winter.
The Guardian reported this with reference to a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM), TASS reports.
According to the most optimistic forecast of experts who are part of the emergency situation advisory group at the British government, by April 2022, the country will record at least 25,000 deaths from the omicron strain, and around 175,000 patients will be hospitalized.
At the peak of the outbreak, the hospital will be treating more than 2,000 infected people per day.
"Serious measures to combat the coronavirus may be required to prevent the National Health Service being overwhelmed if the Omicron variant turns out to be more transmissible than the Delta variant, and existing vaccines are unable to prevent infection," said mathematician Rosanna Barnard from the LSHTM.
Previously, the UK Health Security Agency said that if the rate of spread of the omicron strain remains at the current level, by the end of the year there will be around 1 million cases of infection in the country.
Meanwhile, by mid-December, the Omicron strain could become dominant in the UK.
Currently, 1,898 cases of infection with the omicron strain of the coronavirus have been detected in the UK, of which 633 have been identified in the last 24 hours.
At the same time, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health, Sajid Javid, stated that in reality, this figure may already reach 10,000 cases.
I wanted to write a clever comment, but I got to this point:
"Shuba received as a result of the animal's unimaginable suffering and its employment in a second job."
And the table collapsed!
Turns out the "unfortunate animal" is a man, and I thought a squirrel!
The last knight on this planet.
Richard Craig, judging by the dislikes, is expressing his thoughts in a way that is not very accessible to most.
What were you trying to say - that those who post on Instagram are pretending or they all succeed, because it's pointless to pretend?
The SZ is like a warehouse, everything that was not disposed of at some point ends up here.
If you set out to dig and dig hard, you can find something valuable in the rubble.
You just need to be patient and clearly understand what you are looking for.
The superyacht boom has grown by a quarter in the world
The construction of superyachts this year and orders for next year are breaking all records, despite calls to reduce carbon emissions and fight climate change.
The world fleet of yachts has 1200 units, which is 25% more than last year.
In the era of fighting the effects of climate change, it is hard to imagine that the number of people who have the desire and money to build a £50 million-plus floating palace will not dwindle, writes The Guardian.
However, they are becoming more and more.
This year, 25% more ships were ordered than in the previous year.
Brokers say there hasn't been such a frenzy on the market in 20 years.
The first reason is that many who can afford a yacht are afraid of infection on land and prefer to stay away from the pandemic on their own boat.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
Previously, all these people would go to the office and meet with business partners in person, but now an absolute majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are conducted over the phone.
Broker Will Christie told the paper that shipyards are taking orders for new yachts for 2025 and beyond.
This means that customers are willing to pay more, just to have their yacht ready at least a year or two earlier.
"People just want freedom, and the super-rich can afford it," he says.
In western society, many people criticize such behaviour and call it decadent.
The rich, say sociologists, do not want to understand that in times of scarcity, traveling in space, living on yachts or flying on their own planes causes irritation in society because the elite does not want to share the responsibility for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are urging governments to act and are proposing new taxes and rules for the super-rich, although they recognise that it will be extremely difficult to implement.
On the other hand, the sheer number of super-yachts ordered is impressive, as are their specifications.
Of the 1200 ships, 27 have a length of the bow above 100 meters.
The Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the REV Ocean yacht, which is 183 meters long.
After launch, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht has a "lunar pool" and a submarine designed for studying the depths of the ocean.
On existing superyachts, helipads have become commonplace, as have open-air cinemas, and on some of them, such as the one owned by the wrestler McGregor, there is a platform for combat sports. Professor of economic anthropology at the University of Indiana Richard Wilk says that compared to the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions, the carbon footprint of the super-rich is insignificant.
But it has symbolic value if you consider that there are less than 2000 billionaires in the world.
This is just another example of a very small group of people overindulging.
Scientists found that the emission trail of the billionaires is thousands of times larger than the average citizen's footprint on the planet.
If one person produces an average of 5 tonnes of CO2 per year, then the planet's biggest polluter, Roman Abramovich, is responsible for 33.9 tonnes of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere in 2018.
At the same time, two-thirds of the emission trace fell on his yacht, the length of which is 162.5 meters.
Even if the owner is not on board the yacht, the crew continues to pollute the planet.
The owner can call the captain and give the order to tow the yacht, for example, from the Mediterranean to the Caribbean.
The owners of superyachts are not sympathetic to other people when they, like the richest woman in Australia, Gina Rinehart, who owns mines on the continent, complain through YouTube that there is no place for a mooring for their giant ships.
It is also difficult to understand her call to build marinas for ships of 50 meters in length.
Dangerous weekly alcohol dose linked to bowel cancer
American scientists have determined how much alcohol in a week increases the risk of developing cancer.
This is reported by the Daily Express newspaper.
Experts have concluded that the consumption of four or more alcoholic drinks per week is associated with an increased risk of cancer.
In this case, the likelihood of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
Moreover, moderate drinkers have a higher risk of developing colorectal cancer than women.
The exact cause of this type of oncology cannot be determined, scientists note, noting that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the body.
Thank you to the author for the high-quality material and photos.
Sergey, I don't see anything wrong with egoism and pride.
Just like you can't see the narcissism and hubris in the cuckold who seeks a free surrogate mother to bear the costs and responsibilities, while enjoying the title of father from a safe distance.
Why they work in the ministry, they have a place in the circus.
I understand that everything should have been on a royal scale, but the model is very exaggerated.
It is hard to imagine how poor Diana was crammed into a carriage, and even more difficult to imagine any kind of movement.
I was 12 years old and I remember watching the ceremony on TV.
It would seem that almost all girls dream of being princesses in beautiful, lavish dresses, and I am no exception.
But looking at this dress, I reconsidered being a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old child
Many, or rather all dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they don't realize how developed four-legged pets really are.
For many years, biologists have conducted various experiments to determine how intelligent animals are.
While a dog's vocabulary is not as extensive as a human's, a new study has shown that a dog can respond to 89 words or phrases.
The work of the scientists was published in the Sciencealert publication.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they don't understand politics, economics, or the arts, but they often manage to deceive their owners.
Experts say some breeds are better at understanding human language, but there are not enough statistics to draw firm conclusions.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered dog geniuses - for example, Labrador Retrievers.
Scientists have come to the conclusion that dogs are capable of logical thinking, and in terms of their ability to learn, they do not lag behind a two-year-old child.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
The mattress is on an independent spring block TFK with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made on the basis of an independent block TFK.
This is a modern design with 512 independent springs on the bed.
Each spring is in its own compartment and does not affect the neighboring ones.
In this way, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
The person takes on a natural form during sleep.
The springs are insulated from the upper layers of the thermal blanket.
Above the felt, there are layers of natural latex and cocoa, which have excellent and beautiful properties.
One side is covered with a thin layer of natural seven-zone leather.
This natural filler has 7 zones of comfort, helps to perceive the weight of a person, has a light massage effect.
The Antistress cover is made of velour, stretched over 250 g of velveteen on a square meter.
It is pleasant to the touch and externally, it has calming, relaxing properties.
Sova, a bright example - deep-sea diver Taumaitich Axel.
Some of his victims are so great that they become the cause of the death of the joker.
He simply can't swallow them, and his teeth don't allow him to spit out too much of the catch back into the water.
If you don't care about the fate of your four properties, why did you decide that someone would be interested in them and they would be taken care of?
Today, the law fully allows you to manage your property.
Do it yourself if you don't like how others do it.
Ukraine is preparing for trade with the United States and Russia
The United States and Russia will “trade” over Ukraine’s entry into NATO, stated analyst Alexander Kochetkov in his article for the publication “Glavred”.
According to him, Washington and Moscow are planning to continue talks on the guarantees of the United States regarding the fact that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Alliance, despite the words of the American leader Joe Biden about the right of countries "to join anywhere."
If you are offered something that is obviously unacceptable, for example, selling a close relative into sexual slavery, you will not trade, but simply send the proposer away.
And in relation to Ukraine, there is a trade," the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia does not plan to attack Ukraine, but is seeking dialogue with Kiev.
"The training is conducted secretly, quickly and immediately moves to offensive actions, not waiting for the grouping to be detected and the forces of resistance to be deployed," he noted.
China stimulates the development of the railway transport industry
Cutting-edge Chinese technologies attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Exhibition, which was held in the city of Zhuzhou, Hunan Province /Central China/.
The main technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co. Ltd. allow trains to automatically detect and diagnose technical faults, said a company representative, Hou Zhaowen.
High-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, which will ensure increased reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
In the past six months, China has significantly increased the export of railway transport equipment, and many countries in Asia and Europe are witnessing the "Chinese speed".
In May this year, the first two-story high-speed electric trains developed in China by the CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd. came off the production line. They are intended for export to Europe.
With a maximum speed of 200 kilometres per hour, these trains will run on the Austrian, German, Hungarian and other European railways.
In November, a trial run of the metro train developed by the aforementioned company for Turkey began.
The train will run along the metro line connecting the centre of Istanbul with the city's airport.
The metro line in this direction will be opened next year.
It will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 kilometres per hour.
"China's equipment manufacturing industry for railway transport is one of the industries with the highest level of innovation and the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Fan Yajian, head of the trade and investment department of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade (CCPIT).
"This industry is the main competitive advantage of Chinese high-end equipment production on the global market," Feng Yajian said.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has created a leading production system for railway equipment, with a full range of auxiliary equipment and large-scale production.
According to Feng Yajian, the country ranks first in terms of the level of electrification of railways and the operating mileage on high-speed and urban railways.
The biologist listed early signs of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semyon Goloshchekin in conversation with the radio station Sputnik listed the early signs of dementia.
According to him, signs of future dementia may include forgetfulness, as well as a whole range of mild cognitive impairments, such as difficulty concentrating, planning, and a decrease in abstract thinking.
Currently, there is a discussion about whether hearing loss can be an early sign of Alzheimer's disease or one of the risk factors for its development, a specialist said.
Goloshchekin stressed that the causes of dementia can be neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, certain infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and cerebrovascular atherosclerosis are the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that to date, doctors do not know effective ways of treating dementia.
Therefore, it is necessary to start its prophylaxis in time.
According to him, studying foreign languages and active communication will help to reduce the risk of dementia.
The WHO also recommends maintaining moderate physical activity, regularly training cognitive skills with games and hobbies that require intense memory and logical thinking
"There are recommendations for the use of various BAs, however, their effectiveness and expediency are still being discussed in the scientific community," said Goloshchekin.
"The World Health Organization recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regular training of cognitive skills and abilities through games and hobbies that require intense involvement of memory and logical thinking," said Goloshchekin.
Previously, the UK charity Alzheimer's Research UK said the disease was increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
Doctors have identified the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be vision problems, which cause the patient to have trouble recognizing objects.
Another sign of developing dementia, according to specialists, is aphasia - a state in which a person cannot find the right words to convey what they want to say.
A neurologist demanded that Saakashvili be sent abroad for treatment
Former President of Georgia Mikhail Saakashvili needs psychoneurological treatment and rehabilitation abroad, said neurologist Otar Toidze, who is a member of the council of doctors created by the ombudsman of Georgia.
His neurological status is the leading cause of his illness.
The stable problems are movement, coordination, and character variability," the specialist said, noting that this does not go beyond the norm and now the former president needs to be sent to a special rehabilitation facility.
"This is what we call neurorehabilitation and psychoneurorehabilitation, which we did not find in Georgia," Toidezi said, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a special facility, which does not exist in Georgia.
On December 7, Saakashvili began sabotaging medical care after prison service staff disciplined him.
The Georgian politician managed to quickly overturn the punishment and regain his previous rights.
Aleksandra, "Are you taking money for this, too?" - I'm curious where such people come from...
It is normal to pay for bread in a bakery, but not for the work of a tutor?
Or are we so holy that we feed on spirit?
There is another side to the medal.
These people are parasites on society.
They don't work, they don't pay taxes, they live on benefits and at the expense of relatives.
At the same time, they receive full medical care.
How many mouths can a working stomach feed?
We feed all the alcoholics, drug addicts who have also lost their health due to their stupidity.
Then we are surprised by the extension of the pension age.
These sums could have been spent on treating actual sick people.
Of course, the red flag of Victory will forever remain in the history of our country and should not be mixed with the state flag.
The red flag has a reverse side, it is a symbol of the communist movement, so it will never be a state flag again.
The author should stop writing provocative articles, and start living a normal life instead of dwelling on the past.
Protests against COVID passports took place in Spain
Protests against mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificates took place in Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, Europa Press reports.
In the Catalan capital, the number of participants in the action was approximately 3,000.
In Barcelona, COVID passports have become mandatory for going to bars, restaurants, sports facilities, nursing homes and night clubs.
Many of the protesters came to the demonstration without masks.
They accused the state of totalitarianism and called on citizens to respect their choice.
In Valencia, vaccination certificates will also be required for entry into entertainment venues and restaurants with a capacity of more than 50 people.
Protesters in this city have declared a medical dictatorship, and the vaccination has been called an experiment.
In Spain, more than 5.2 million cases of coronavirus infection have been detected since the beginning of the pandemic, more than 88,000 patients have died.
In Russia, it is also planned to introduce restrictions for the unvaccinated.
The government submitted draft laws on a unified QR code system to the State Duma on November 12.
It is assumed that Russians will be able to visit places of mass events, cultural institutions, public catering and retail outlets with the presentation of either a vaccination certificate or a certificate of a previous illness, or a vaccination certificate.
The same rules will be established for train and air travel.
Jarovna Tradition Anthracite 26 cm cast with glass lid.
The cast iron is coated with an anti-rust coating called Antracite TM Tradition.
The pot is designed for daily use in the home.
The exclusive anti-slip coating, which is as durable as natural stone, has been specially developed for intensive use every day.
Thick-walled cast body.
A five-layer anti-slip coating system of the latest generation.
Premium coverage, enhanced with mineral particles.
Two layers of additional protection against the suburbs.
Has good anti-stick properties for easy and pleasant preparation of healthy dishes without oil and fat.
At least 4000 thousand cycles of operation, in compliance with the rules of operation.
Suitable for all types of plates, except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The warranty for each item is 4 years (provided that the rules of operation are followed for 4 years for the body and 1 year for the anti-corrosive coating).
They do not contain PFOA, LEAD, and CADMIUM.
Cast iron skillets and grills can be used in an oven without a glass lid.
Ease of cleaning.
Logic would dictate that the virus is constantly changing.
If a person is healthy and rarely gets sick (once or twice a year with the flu), then his immunity is normal.
Immunomodulators are not recommended for prophylaxis at all by any doctor.
Immunity is supported by healthy eating and a plus sport regime.
In this case, vaccination against the flu and this COVID-19 is pointless.
The 3M 5925 air filter.
FFP2 degree of protection, 2 pieces.
Article No. 713946.
A replacement filter for the FFP2 masks 3M 6000, 3M 7500 and full-face masks 3M.
Protects the user's respiratory tract from various substances in the air.
Creates a reliable barrier for infectious particles.
This filter is designed for operation in conditions where the concentration of harmful substances in the ambient air exceeds the permissible value.
The filter can be used to protect against bacteria/viruses, for example, with essential oils and other antibacterial agents.
The FFP2 class of protection has a PD value greater than 0.05 mg/m3, at a maximum concentration of contaminants of 12 times the PD value.
This class of respirator is capable of retaining at least 94% of harmful substances.
The prefilters are attached to the gas mask filters with the 3M 501 holder.
Features: low resistance to breathing.
It is not difficult to see.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half masks, and full face masks 3M.
Compatibility with other PPE required in difficult working conditions is ensured.
The "constitutional monarch's" eyes, according to the network, have not only gotten me.
And this family PR - children, father...
Reva seemed like some kind of nothing to me.
Only knew that Zaitsev was annoying - Zaitsev and Zaitsev.
Well, I found out, said once, and kept quiet, let my friend show himself, that's why they fought.
A steep climb: how Chinese become skiers
The Olympics should attract millions of people to the slopes and help create world-class resorts in the country
In China, they hope that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to take up winter sports, which will help to collect the 1 trillion yuan President Xi Jinping has designated, but will also contribute to the economic development of lagging remote provinces.
The ski resort of Taivu in Zhangjiakou, located near the site of the Winter Olympics, is becoming increasingly popular with Chinese people.
In addition to building infrastructure in the region, work is also being done to plant trees: workers plant trees.
There are more than 700 ski resorts in the country, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international competitions.
In many regions of China, where resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou, there are problems with snow.
The main task for the long-term perspective is to ensure a comfortable and interesting holiday in Chinese resorts, so that all newcomers become regular visitors.
However, this is still a long way off.
Beijing Games adviser Justin Downs says the Chinese ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
More and more Chinese people are heading to the slopes in the winter.
Fiona, a Beijing snowboarder, is one of them.
Despite the major changes, it will take many more years to create a skiing culture here, says Downs.
Many resorts are located in rural and mining areas.
These regions still need to be actively developed and the necessary infrastructure for rest created there.
70-year-old Gao Makong lives in Chongli, near the site of the Winter Olympics.
He notes that in recent years there has been a boom in winter sports tourism here.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was built from Beijing to Chongli, and now no one in the local area suffers from unemployment.
More and more shops are opening in the country that sell clothing and equipment for winter sports.
On the slopes, they open points of public catering with national cuisine dishes.
There is even a COVID-19 testing station in Taipei now.
China is aiming to create a thriving winter sports industry, with its athletes becoming leaders at the world's biggest competitions, and resorts and equipment reaching world-class standards.
More than 500 million people in the world could face extreme poverty due to the pandemic, WHO says
More than 500 million people in the world could be plunged into extreme poverty due to the coronavirus pandemic, which has stalled progress towards universal health coverage, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank (WB) said.
In observance of the 12 December International Day of Universal Health Coverage, WHO and the World Bank published two complementary reports.
They found that the pandemic has led to disruptions in the provision of primary health care, has caused excessive strain on health care systems.
In this regard, for the first time in 10 years, the coverage of the population with immunization has decreased, the mortality from tuberculosis and malaria has increased.
The WHO and the World Bank stressed that the pandemic has caused "the worst economic crisis since the 1930s, so people are finding it harder to pay for treatment."
This situation is pushing more than 500 million people into extreme poverty, because they have to pay for these services out of their own pockets.
In October, UN Secretary-General António Guterres said that the coronavirus pandemic has plunged more than 100 million people into poverty, and more than four billion people have almost no social support.
Makita KP0810
Official Makita dealer.
The powerful motor is ideal for drilling.
Small weight and great balance.
The use of both standard and double-sided mini-saws.
A simple system for quick blade installation.
A new ergonomic design of the body, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce the action of vibrations on the user's hands.
Three V-shaped grooves for removing fascia of varying thickness.
The dust removal system by choice: to the left or to the right.
Wife, this is a pelt from a fur-bearing animal.
It's awful.
The flying mice have already gorged themselves on the pangolins, and the medusae have begun to attack.
Oh, how many more wonders of the world can the little critters surprise us with?
Reuters: Taiwan minister cut off from White House 'Democracy Summit' call by request of White House
A speech by Taiwan's Minister of Digital Affairs Odri Tan at a panel discussion at the US-organized "Summit for Democracy" was switched to a no-video mode, according to a recording of the summit on YouTube.
Reuters reported, citing sources, that the image was turned off at the request of the White House.
According to their report, the cause was a map in which Taiwan was marked out in a different colour from China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map shown by Ms Tan was compiled by the South African non-governmental organisation CIVICUS and ranked countries according to their level of civil rights.
Taiwan was designated green as "free," while China, North Korea, Laos and Vietnam were designated red as "closed."
After the minister showed the map, the picture from her side was replaced with a screenshot with a note that the opinions of the participants "do not necessarily reflect the position of the U.S. government."
China was not invited to the "Democracy Summit".
Reuters sources noted that the map shown by the Taiwanese minister could run counter to Washington's "One China" policy.
One of the agency's sources said that after the map was shown, the US National Security Council was angry with the State Department, accusing it of showing Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-organized "Democracy Summit" took place from December 9 to 10 with the participation of representatives of 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society organizations and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
During the “zero day” of the summit, the Nobel Peace Prize laureate, the editor-in-chief of Novaya Gazeta, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international fund through which money obtained through corruption would be donated to charity.
Earlier today, the deputy secretary of the Russian Security Council, Yuri Averianov, stated that the summit was "anti-Russian and anti-Chinese."
They tell you that they are preparing food, but there is always rotten meat there, the meat is left until the last piece, the butcher keeps it.
Journalism is the art of making news out of nothing.
They boil not meat, but horns and hooves, and get a substance like glue.
The ready product looks like a yellowish semi-transparent strip with almost no smell and is hard like plastic, used as a natural gelatin.
In fact, there are no more harmful substances in the processing of waste than in its decomposition.
But this saves companies a lot of money.
Therefore, a fairy tale about ecology was invented for the loaches, who are also working hard to collect garbage for the idea.
My personal contribution to the environment is to refuse unnecessary purchases and to use things for a long time.
If I go beyond the boundaries, I don't throw it away, I donate it to charity.
Football shorts Jogel Camp Jfs-1120-016, white/black (XL).
Description: Football shorts are ideal for playing football and sports.
Shorts have a straight, comfortable fit.
The wide belt combined with the adjustable strap provides a comfortable seat.
The fabric has high strength, durability, lightness and good air permeability, meeting the requirements of playing at any level.
The updated brand logo is on the left side.
Shorts are packaged in a multi-use, easy-to-use pouch with a snap-on closure.
Stylish appearance, straight cut, wide belt with a buckle, durable and long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Features.
Pursue a career that allows you to work online.
Many of us are squeezed by the fact that we work for our uncle, but abroad.
But because of the difference in currencies, this is advantageous for us.
As for other countries, we are still poor.
Of course, you will have to learn different tricks, but... the network allows you to not depend on the internal labor market.
But our country is not creating any jobs.
And those who create, they don’t pay much attention to them.
A set of tableware "Egoist-unity" with gold plating (4 items).
The “Royal Childhood” collection is one of the largest and most famous collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It contains a multitude of charming models of silver spoons, forks, knives, ladles, salt and pepper shakers, and pepper pots.
All children's silver items are subject to strict quality control.
The eco-silver produced directly on the factory, meticulous hand polishing with cotton balls makes the products absolutely safe for children.
Silver's antimicrobial properties can help support the body's natural immunity and even prevent some common childhood illnesses.
The factory's specialists received a grant to use a complex, but very beautiful technique of guillochage, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This allowed for the creation of incredibly vivid and three-dimensional images on the products.
The collection is full of cute characters that will become the child's loyal friends.
Inka Belka, everything will be all right.
There is another light.
Lung tissue regenerates well if all of it is removed, but the remaining part will grow back.
If it is a pneumonectomy, then the second lung will become larger and will function better for two people.
Try to breathe fully, fathers are stronger than daughters, their tears are not very pleasant.
Don't mourn too early.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made suborbital flight
The New Shepard spacecraft of the Blue Origin company with six tourists on board made a suborbital flight on Saturday, 11 December.
The journey, which was broadcast on the company's website, lasted for more than ten minutes, after which the capsule with the passengers descended to Earth, TASS reports.
The launch of the rocket was carried out from the cosmodrome in the vicinity of the American city of Van Horn (Texas).
The ship rose to a height of about 100 km, and the space tourists found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The rocket-carrier was supposed to land on the cosmodrome's launch pad.
Blue Origin successfully conducted the first suborbital flight of the New Shepard spacecraft with passengers on board on July 20.
ZARISOVKI DERVENSKOGO MOSKVIČA.
Don't lump them all together - bad people do exist, and you may have claims against them for a specific reason...
But what does this have to do with the number of children, age, pension fund and other things?
Write that they are "thieves who did not return the money."
But how many and when to have children is not your business, until they gather these children and hang them on your neck.
But if this is excluded, what right do you have to condemn them?
Well, it's probably only in education...
The chosen (by themselves) parents dictate their own rules, openly flouting the existing ones.
And if this will affect other areas of life, such as the judicial system and so on?
For them, the laws are not written.
And if dad still decides to implement his method of upbringing and education?
What a bad example it is.
The embroidery set "Feathered Stars" DESIGN WORKS 2719.
The set includes: Aida 14ct dark blue canvas, mulline, sequins, beads, needle, scheme, instruction.
Design Works production has its origins in 1987 and is still popular all over the world.
Many motifs have been worked out by the well-known designer Ronald West.
The Design Works embroidery kits are equipped with high-quality Aida fabric, 100% cotton muline, and a No. 24 embroidery needle.
You will also find sets for plastic canvas embroidery, Tobin embroidery, which is embroidery on napkins, tablecloths and curtains, and much more.
China strengthens prevention and control of COVID-19 in cities with land ports of entry
The joint prevention and control mechanism of the State Council of the People's Republic of China issued a circular requiring the strengthening of prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports of entry, in order to further prevent the importation of the infection from abroad.
According to the circular, people leaving the specified cities must provide a negative nucleic acid test result for COVID-19 obtained within 48 hours before departure.
Those traveling to cities where land border crossings are located must present at least one nucleic acid test for COVID-19 upon arrival.
The document states that these requirements will apply from the date when the corresponding administrative units of the provincial level determine and publish the zones of the specified cities until March 15, 2022.
In addition, it is noted that cities with land border crossings that meet certain conditions may consider the possibility of creating buffer zones for the prevention and control of COVID-19 within their jurisdiction.
Taisya Sokolova, as usual, draws Russian women to the Eastern ethnicity through Indian films, which are only shown in Russian cinemas.
On the west, no one has seen this rubbish with the natives.
And how many cities and villages forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Spring Mattress Vivre Castom family, 140x195, article: 5110704.
The RelaxFoam 2 cm mattress layers composition: aloe-latex 3 cm, coconut 2 cm TFK, coconut 2 cm, aloe-latex 3 cm, RelaxFoam 2 cm.
The cover is a three-piece Splendid knit.
The cotton fabric has a special design.
The base is woven with special synthetic threads that provide special strength and softness to the material.
The knit structure of the hammock supports natural thermoregulation and moisture evaporation during sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, density 230 g/m2.
Dimax OK Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The O.K. Basis orthopedic mattress is one of the most affordable models in the line.
The practical Balance Foam filler gives the mattress all the necessary orthopedic properties, but at a budget price.
This product is an optimal combination of price and quality.
Pen Balance is a modern material that is made from PPU.
The filler is hypoallergenic and safe.
That is why pen is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate obtained in Europe, where such requirements are much stricter than in Russia.
Another important quality of the Balance Foam is its orthopedics: the material supports the correct position of the person throughout the duration of sleep.
Thanks to the pen mattress, the mattress gained a hardness below the average level, so the product is considered to be sufficiently soft by the manufacturer.
The main supporting block in the mattress is SuperSprings.
It is notable for the content of independent springs, here there are 256 elements per square metre.
The practical block can withstand a weight of up to 100 kg on the sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, strengthening the orthopedic properties of the mattress.
The manufacturer offers the option of choosing between a 12 cm and 18 cm spring block without changing the final price.
Please specify your preferences when ordering the operator of the store.
The mattress is delivered in a knitted cover, and its height is 21 cm.
The cover is non-removable.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certification.
Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG lamp by Arte Lamp.
It would be perfect for rooms such as a living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
The lighting device is provided in color: gold.
The lamps are fitted with E14 sockets.
The total power allows to illuminate approximately 2 m2.
The manufacturer recommends this lamp for rooms decorated in the “Classic” style.
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs reported on the “painful withdrawal” of relations between Russia and the United States
The deputy head of the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Sergei Ryabkov, in an interview with Izvestia, assessed the prospects of relations between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that the long path of interaction has led to tragic conclusions, and the problems between the two countries began not yesterday.
One-sided negative predictability is there, but in terms of some sort of improvement in relations, everything is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion after a long journey we've been on with this administration, with Trump, and with Obama.
The problems started not yesterday," the diplomat said.
According to Rybakov, the problems are due to the United States' desire to impose its approaches on Russia in a number of areas.
The deputy head of the Foreign Ministry added that he would not have dared to give optimistic forecasts about the prospects for improving relations and would not have expected a change in Washington's position.
He explained that progress is not being seen in areas such as strategic stability and cyber security.
Russia, meanwhile, urges the United States to take a responsible approach to issues of international security and hopes that the signals will be heard and that Americans will listen to the arguments of reason.
Earlier, Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov stated at a meeting with US Secretary of State Antony Blinken that Moscow is ready to resume dialogue with the United States.
A virologist warned of the danger of vaccinating with a nasal COVID-19 vaccine outside hospitals
People who have been vaccinated with the nasal vaccine against COVID-19 may develop an allergic reaction and may need medical assistance, so the first points for vaccination with this vaccine should not be organized in airports and shopping malls.
This was reported by TASS, a virologist, corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, head of the laboratory of bionano-technologies, microbiology and virology at the Novosibirsk State University, Sergei Netesov.
It is easier to set up vaccination points for intranasal vaccine in airports and shopping centres, but I would do this only in medical institutions in the first instance.
The fact is that there is a possibility of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine, it is small, but it is desirable that a person remains nearby the doctor's office after this.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy drugs that work literally within minutes or two, which is sometimes very important," Netesov said.
According to the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccination in shopping malls when there is experience in using the drug.
He also stressed that when using a nasal vaccine, it is important that it reaches the mucous membrane in the nasal cavity.
However, there is a possibility that the vaccine will not reach its destination if the person being vaccinated sneezes after the injection.
A painting by numbers on canvas, anime "Sword Art Online" 5426 40x60.
Do you want to feel like a real artist?
The numbers are interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many love to draw, but sometimes lack the skills or abilities.
This is a simple but very engaging activity that allows you to relax, realize your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
There is a wide range of unusual pictures and "off-the-beaten-track" plots!
We develop current storylines ourselves and try to make the result pleasing to you!
It's all very simple!
When the outlines are painted on the canvas, they do not "float", they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered to avoid getting lost in the paint.
The picture in its finished form will become a bright element of the interior, a highlight, attracting attention from the first glance.
After all, this picture was not drawn by some artist.
You drew her yourself.
With my own hands!
Serbia produced 2 million doses of the “Sputnik V” vaccine
The Sputnik V vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
Serbia produced about 2 million doses of the Russian vaccine Sputnik V, Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of the country Nenad Popovic told TASS.
"The State Institute of Torlak has produced about 2 million doses of the "Sputnik V" vaccine so far. We expect that at least 4 million doses will be produced in the coming period," Popovich stated.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
In this regard, the republic plans to purchase an additional million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
The Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of Serbia also expressed interest in producing the nasal vaccine "Sputnik V" and the drug "Sputnik Light" on the territory of the country.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin has reported that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of its domestic coronavirus vaccine “Sputnik V” to Serbia.
The true believers are the church, they say.
We can't know whether these true believers exist or not.
Each of us would like to be a true believer, and each strives to be one.
But no one should talk about themselves or about those who believe as they do that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say about themselves that they are true believers, then they can say the same about others.
The Benartti Prime Orto S1000 145x190 mattress.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different firmness sides, the overall height of the mattress is 22 cm.
The maximum load on one sleeping place is 150 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is housed in its own tissue pocket, which allows the springs to properly distribute the body's weight.
To protect the spring block, an insulating layer of wool was added, which separates the mattress fillers and springs.
On one side of the mattress is a layer of coconut coir 3 cm thick, which adds extra firmness and longevity to the mattress.
On the opposite side of the mattress, a layer of coconut coir 3 cm and natural latex 1 cm was added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made from cotton Jacquard fabric, which is printed on an eco-friendly material called Hollcon.
The fabric was treated with a special antibacterial treatment, Sanitized (Sweden).
The impregnation provides complete destruction of mold spores, prevents the development of microorganisms, dust mites and microbes.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning, as well as air vents for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress is additionally reinforced with a frame made of artificial latex, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., Please remind me, how did the marathon at the 2021 World Championships go?
You can see the track on which the participants of the race should finish in the classical style?
Attention, the question is what Klevob is doing to the right of Bolshunov and how he wants to get onto the slope if he was going behind the barrel before the turn?
And the "best finisher" over 1.5 km and after 50 km are two different things.
It's been a long time...
I was, in fact, not even the driver.
He had the rights, but he didn't know how to ride.
They offered to drive 250 km in one direction on the MAZE!
Young, foolish, agreed.
The host is nearby, drinking water, I am eating.
First, as king, he occupied the center!
A column formed behind me.
Missed.
Then the belt on the GUR broke.
Then we were stopped by the guards.
The column was organized, and their car broke down.
It needs to be towed.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk, and the driver was inexperienced.
And what kind of drunk are you?
Don't trip, don't fall.
Ahead of us are the blinkers and ahead!
I don't think the advert is going anywhere, it's hurting him.
The singers are saying the same thing: about returning the pensionable age.
Long ago, all budgets have been drawn up taking into account the billions of unclaimed pensions.
Who is telling them this?
In the UK, 1239 cases of the omicron coronavirus strain were recorded in one day - RT in Russian
In the UK, 1239 cases of infection with the new omicron strain of the coronavirus have been identified within one day.
Sky News reports on this.
In particular, 1196 new cases of the "Omicron" strain were recorded in England, 38 people were infected with a new strain of the disease in Scotland, and five in Northern Ireland.
The total number of people infected with the new strain of COVID-19 in the UK has reached 3,137.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that by April, due to the outbreak of the coronavirus strain "Omicron", 75,000 people could die in England.
Peskov warned about the suffering of western countries that impose anti-Russian sanctions
The press secretary of the President of the Russian Federation, Dmitry Peskov, commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the event of continued "aggressive actions" against Ukraine, including due to the alleged "invasion" of the country's territory.
“It is impossible to introduce restrictions against Russia and not feel the pain yourself,” the official representative of the Kremlin said on the Russia 1 television channel.
Peskov says this is "understood by everyone in the world."
Earlier it was reported that the United States is considering the possibility of introducing anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as a last resort.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to introduce restrictions that will make it more difficult to convert rubles into dollars in relation to Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
At the same time, the head of Sberbank, German Gref, is confident that this is impossible.
From people with common sense - respectively, common sense comments!
Something from these simple recipes is already making me nauseous.
It seems the ideas have ended.
Even in the distant past, mom baked delicious pies and cakes, and it never occurred to her to compare a piece of bread smeared with jam to a cake.
Ksenia, you don’t need to bring anything to my mind, my mind will sort things out on its own!
"The inability of the mind divided from the Spirit to perceive" - what are you talking about?!
Imagine explaining this to a child who doesn't know how to count, how would you do it?!
(Please note that children under 3-5 years old still have open channels of communication with the subtle world, and the child may know more than you!)
New Caledonia residents reject idea of independence from France
According to the final results of the third independence referendum in New Caledonia, a majority of participants refused to leave the French community.
This was reported by the French television channel BFM.TV on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted opposed independence.
3.51% of the archipelago's population in the South Pacific supported independence from France.
The results of 2.99% of the ballots were annulled.
The turnout on this day was very low: only about 55% of the archipelago's residents turned out to vote.
According to experts, the low turnout is explained by calls from separatists to boycott the referendum due to the coronavirus.
Paris refused to move the referendum date.
In October 2020, the people of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
A referendum on independence was held in the region in 2018.
Most of the residents supported the archipelago's inclusion in France.
New Caledonia is almost 20,000 kilometres from mainland France.
In 1853, France declared New Caledonia its possession.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, and the territory is granted special administrative-territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and the New Caledonia administration stipulates that the region can hold a referendum on its independence every two years.
Boris, if you don't know the history, don't write.
The name of the city of Arsk is derived from the Bulgarian-Tatar word “artash” (juniper).
The Udmurts (or Arys in Tatar) live in the northern areas of Balta-Sinyaksky, Kukmorsky districts.
The Udmurts are good, hardworking people, they have preserved their own language, they live in friendship with the Tatars, and they know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don't know your age, but I want to tell you that your homeland will never abandon you.
They throw idiots who are shouting "good slogans".
I am saying this to you with full confidence, based on my life experience.
Don't piss in the well, maybe the drivers will have to drink!
WHO preliminary considers omicron less dangerous than delta
The World Health Organization (WHO) has preliminarily determined that "omicron" is less dangerous than the Delta strain of the coronavirus.
However, there are data on the decrease in the effectiveness of vaccines against the new variant of COVID-19.
As of December 9, “Omicron” has been registered in 63 countries.
"Preliminary data and a significantly altered antigen profile of the omicron strain suggest a reduced efficacy of the vaccine against infection and transmission of the variant.
Preliminary findings from South Africa suggest that it (the severity of the disease - rare) may be less severe than the "delta" variant, the World Health Organization (WHO) said in a technical bulletin.
The organization notes that all registered cases of infection with "omicron" in the EU are currently mild or asymptomatic.
At the same time, the new strain is spreading faster than the “Delta”.
There have been two cases of infection with the omicron strain in Russia.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaleya Center reported.
The head of Rostechnadzor, Anna Popova, stated that there are no reliable data on whether the new coronavirus variant is less dangerous than the others.
In fact, the lack of sun for us, southerners, is very critical.
In ten days spent in St. Petersburg, somewhere in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our returning plane took off over the clouds.
Then I realized what I had been missing all this time in the beautiful Petersburg.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To know what one didn't know before - eyes, mouth, and skin - is to have a lot to drink!
Who sees only water in the ocean
The one on the ground does not notice the mountains.
Your world of adventures +7 905 989 9172 What'sApp
Siberian Expeditions - we can even spoil your worst mood!
Svetlana S., not-ah, there is no such thing - they don't submit.
If your beloved, with whom you are going to spend the rest of your life, does not comply with your requests, then he is a parasite who does not want to give back as much as he takes.
The problem with women is that they are slowly but surely taking everything on themselves.
And who is to blame if she caught herself in a lie?
Four scenarios for Zelensky have been named in Ukraine
Former Verkhovna Rada deputy Vadim Denisenko listed four scenarios for President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky in 2022.
According to him, the head of state may remain without the support of the West, and may even make concessions on Donbass.
On Sunday, December 12, Denisenko wrote about this in a publication on the website “Mainred”.
The first option, Denischenko called "the ideal storm," assumes that the key Western countries will stop supporting Ukraine, reaching an agreement on the country's future without its participation.
Such a development will contribute to a deep crisis that Kyiv may face in 2023.
"At the same time, there is a decrease in the prices of key products that we traditionally export ... internal protests and opposition to the authorities by key FPGs (financial-industrial groups. - Ed.) ", - added the former parliamentarian.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the situation - "a war against everyone."
This forecast will come true in the event of high political turbulence, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
In such a situation, the leadership of Ukraine may be forced to make compromises on Donbass, which could lead to an internal conflict.
By the end of the summer, Zelensky's position will weaken, the likelihood of such a situation, according to the former deputy, is up to 50-55%.
The third option for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is a confrontation between the groups of people who do not agree with Zelensky and the president, which would lead to the seizure of control over the power bloc and the implementation of "populist initiatives".
According to Denisenko, during such a variant of the crisis, Zelensky will begin “restructuring of power”.
Another scenario is to turn Zelensky into “the father of the nation”.
This could be caused by some event that becomes a powerful shock for society.
"The event should be large enough to cause a reaction from external partners and lead to an increase in support for Ukraine," Denisenko said.
Such a development of the situation is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a technogenic catastrophe or aggressive actions of Russia, believes the former deputy.
At the same time, the Russian side has already rejected any possibility of an “attack” on Ukraine.
In Moscow, it was noted that it was the Ukrainian authorities, NATO and the United States that are increasing military activity near the Russian borders.
Earlier, on November 11, the data of the sociological group “Rating” showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president fell to record low levels, reaching 19.3%.
It is the lowest figure since he was elected head of state.
Analysts predicted a situation in which, in the upcoming presidential elections in Ukraine, 21.8% of voters would vote for Zelensky, while 14.5% would vote for the former president of the country, Petro Poroshenko.
At the same time, only 19.3% of those surveyed expressed support for the president.
KAISER Sena soul system (74182)
The KAISER Sena (74182) soul system is one of the best choices in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability of work, this is also confirmed by numerous customer reviews on external Internet resources.
When you purchase this product from us, you also receive a guarantee from us on the quality and functionality of the product.
We deliver by transport companies throughout Russia and to any region.
In the event of any defects being found, we will refund you the full cost you have paid without any problems.
When you call the operator, you can get a personal discount on this product.
Please leave a review after purchase.
Thank you for the story about the great athlete, I didn't know that Elena Shushunova had died, it is very sad to learn this.
I remember how I was rooting for her at the Olympics in Seoul, for us, residents of Primorsky Krai, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such a passion, the emotions were overwhelming, I remember the joy when Elena won.
They were also happy for the other victories, as they cheered for Salnikov, the football players, and all the Soviet athletes.
I once saw a documentary film about one of the Central American countries, and there they were carting bananas onto the ship like barrels.
The apples were enormous.
I have worked on harvesting and loading watermelons in the Astrakhan region many times in my youth and have never seen watermelons weighing more than a pound.
I buy melons weighing 4-5 kg directly from the stand and not earlier than the beginning of August.
A bustier-balconette with soft crocheted cups (size: 90E, color: beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, article: 12008).
A bustier-balconette with soft lace cups, on a frame.
The bottom of the cup is reinforced with a non-elastic transparent plastic.
The side inner part of the cup, in the area of the braiding, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric in the fold, without additional stitches for comfort.
This element allows the fabric to not stretch.
The richness of the embroidery can be appreciated through the festoon along the décolletage and under the bust.
Vertical barbs on the side panels of the one-ply microfibers do not allow the fabric to shrink at larger sizes.
The article was very unpleasant, mean and poisonous.
They walked through people who had nothing to do with them.
But now it is liked by many, people like to disassemble atoms.
I hope that the commentators are honest and decent people who know what they are talking about.
In Moscow, at night, you will think a hundred times whether to go to the store alone, the migrants are everywhere, their crowds.
They consider themselves to be the owners.
And are you serious about child benefits and pensions?
Coins are worth up to three years, pensions are 12,000, someone wrote about dentistry, prosthetics in our clinic have been paid for a long time and are very expensive.
People are like people from another planet.
In France, it's bad, and here it's good?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact structure, comfortable elasticity and firmness, wear-resistant and durable properties.
The “Buitson” brand product from the “Sense” series is designed for the treatment of joint and circulatory system diseases.
The construction provides uniform load distribution over the surface and a pronounced comfort effect.
The Beauty Johnson Sense Hard S600 mini is an independent spring S600 mini with a reduced spring height.
The internal fillers used by Beautyson are spandex, coconut coir and polyurethane.
Spanbond serves as an intermediate isolating layer between soft materials and springs.
The orthopedic gel with coal tar is decorated on the surface of the figure carving, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is a hypoallergenic material that gives the mattress high moisture-wicking and breathability properties.
The outer mattress cover is made from a thick jacquard fabric with synthetic fibres.
The material is durable and long-lasting, does not wear out and does not require special care.
The poet arrested for the action on Red Square: "They're giving me 10 days for a quote by Yevtushenko, it's the power of poetry!"
On the first day of the week, 21-year-old poet Alexander Volchenkov was arrested for ten days.
A student from the Higher School of Economics was detained on Red Square with a placard on which the hashtag #poetforrussia was written.
This quote is attributed to the writer Yevgeny Evtushenko.
A protocol was drawn up for Alexander for an administrative offense for repeated violation of the rules for conducting a public event.
He was first detained on January 23 at Pushkin Square, at a rally in support of Alexei Navalny.
"The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, unfortunately, interest in it, unfortunately, has been lost, and the decline of the culture in Russia as a whole, as well as a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems on the Internet under this hashtag," Alexander explains.
We have reached out to the young poet to learn more about the circumstances of his arrest and to better understand his message.
How did the police officers treat you when they arrested you this time and in the past?
What did the department ask about your action, and how did they comment on it?
This time the officers were more polite, the arrest was minimal, courteous, as it would sound in some context of this word.
At Pushkin Square, the OMONs took action and were tough.
They asked about motivation.
When they heard, in principle, they watched if not approvingly, then understandingly.
Except for the fact that the monkey was blown on all four sides, everything was absolutely correct, but I knew where I was going.
And if after the action under this hashtag, a few people start writing their poems, I will not regret these 10 days.
According to the protocol, you should talk to each other in the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe, even if you are alone.
At public and official events, they speak the language of the surrounding area so that everyone understands what happened in the Bundestag on 25 September 2001, or in their native language through an interpreter.
This is the protocol and nothing more, incidentally, Angela Merkel speaks fluent Russian and yet she relies on the services of a translator.
And at official events, a stenographer writes a transcript by hand, and the stenographer does not have to know several languages.
I don't want to say many words, so say no!
And so much water.
Well, to go as a tourist for half a year "to the Andes, then to Nepal."
Before converting all assets into liquid stocks.
And gradually sell these shares, opening an account in any bank in the world.
Selling not in dollars, but in a less dependent on the US currency, for example, Swiss francs.
And then file for divorce from America.
However, this is not all that keeps Americans in the US.
They are confident that the United States is better than anywhere else.
They are raised like this.
The Hansgrohe Quattro three-outlet (15930180) mechanism.
Collection: Quattro; type: concealed-fit mechanism; purpose: for mixer, for bath, for shower; built-in systems: yes; mounting type: built-in (in the wall); body material: brass; concealed-fit mechanism: included; number of mounting holes: 1; country of origin of the brand: Germany; manufacturer's article number: 15930180; EAN code: 4011097345239.
Additional information: regulator required; contents: ceramic cartridge, sealing nut; 3 users; possible simultaneous connection of 2 users (showers); suitable for all external parts of the Quattro system; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers explain how potatoes can help in the fight against age-related conditions
The study found that potatoes are rich in vitamins and microelements that help improve blood circulation and reduce cholesterol levels.
The root vegetable contains vitamins of group B, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic acid and pantothenic acid.
All these elements help to function the body's systems.
In addition, potatoes help in the fight against age-related disorders.
It is beneficial to the digestive tract and can also help prevent hypertension and atherosclerosis if taken regularly.
However, for the greatest benefit, the root vegetable should be boiled or steamed, rather than fried in oil.
The Daily Express previously warned that potatoes can be dangerous for diabetics, as well as other high glycemic index foods.
These are products with carbohydrate content that break down quickly into sugars such as sugar, sweet soft drinks, white rice and white bread.
In early December, Kommersant warned of a possible shortage of Russian potatoes, noting a reduction in their production in personal small-scale farms and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the current shortage of products can only be covered by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates have been removed from Yandex’s distribution
Candidates for the run-off
In 2015, the owners of the RAEK/Media cluster compiled a list of the 100 largest pirate websites on the Russian Internet, and most of them ceased to exist, says the director of the Internet Research Institute, Karen Kazaryan.
But some - Kinogo, Lostfilm, Filmix - have managed to survive, he adds.
For example, on Lostfilm, which is available in search results as both Yandex and Google, you can watch the pirate copies of the Netflix series "Squid Game" and "Love" directed by Anna Melikyan - the original series of the largest Russian video service ivi (which is part of AIV).
On Kinogo, which is also available through search engines, you can watch the animated novelty "Encanto", but, judging by the quality of the video, this is a so-called screen capture (a pirated copy of the film shot in a cinema).
Filmix, which can also be found through search engines, has the series “Univer. 10 Years Later” of the TNT channel (part of “Gazprom Media”).
Svetlana M., sorry, but I wouldn’t care if the son was angry with his mother or not.
If there is any misunderstanding, it is better not to meet, to save time on the way.
Of course, it is good that such things happen rarely.
A bra with soft cups without a frame and a front closure, coffee 135I GI1265.
The T-shaped back is reinforced from the inside with criss-crossed elastic cotton and Lycra.
The bustier is made of microfibre in combination with a mesh fabric for breathability.
Cotton-filled cups for a comfortable fit.
The unique design of the Magiclift (crosses under the breasts and along the decollete supporting inserts) for lifting, separating and supporting the breasts.
The wide and comfortable briefs have a microfiber lining that is adjustable at the back.
Ludmila is now the leading space technology in China.
Russia is already hopelessly behind.
"This idea developed by the Poles" - it would be more accurate to say that Poland merely refined the idea of 1776, but developed it quite effectively.
In fact, the slogan “The periphery is not Russia” appeared in 1848.
In general, this does not change the essence.
I watched her interview, the girl said that her biggest dream is to grow wings, and her father constantly beats her.
Well, all that is very questionable.
Well, I got into a university, what next?
The Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara wall lamp.
A wide circle of light, surrounded by "molecules" of light, provides the most uniform and bright illumination of the space.
"Atomic" or "molecular" design, reflecting the natural and natural essence of each object, is not losing its relevance and allows you to effectively place accents in the interior.
One of the distinctive features of such lamps is their weightlessness.
The thin, almost invisible cables, which are regulated by height, create the impression that the chandelier is floating in the air.
The metal gold fittings and matte-white mini-chandeliers will easily complement any palette, and the ones presented in the collection will become a ready-made ensemble for lighting the living room, bedroom and hallway.
Well, it tastes and looks, you know.
I really liked Tarkhun, not the current one, of course.
The juices were very tasty and came from high glass cylinders.
Three portions of syrup is too much, in my opinion.
Two were fine.
Dimax Micro Ultimate mattress, size 160x190
Orthopedic spring mattress Micro Ultimate.
The model is convenient because it has two different softnesses - high rigidity and slightly softer than average.
Only high-quality and premium fillers were included in the product, which have proven themselves exclusively in the best way.
Springs: a central model is equipped with a block of independent springs “micro-package”.
This means that the bed has 2000 springs that work independently.
It is precisely their functioning that gives a unique point-to-point adjustment.
The "micropackage" is the highest-frequency of all the "Dimax" spring blocks, so it has a very pronounced orthopedic effect and is considered a premium product.
Fillers: above and below the springs are combinations of layers of cork and natural latex.
The only difference is the order of the plates.
If one surface is covered with latex, then the other is covered with coconut coir.
Such a tandem of mattress fillers has already been established as a classic, as it not only provides orthopedic properties, but also anatomical ones.
If the corset provides proper back support, then the latex will provide a surface adaptation to the body.
Cover: The model is supplied in a stretch cotton cover Aloe Vera.
The client can make it either removable or fixed.
The overall height of the product is 27 cm, the recommended load on the bed is 170 kg.
Guarantee and safety: the guarantee period is 3 years.
The mattress has all the necessary certificates and documents confirming its full safety and reliability in operation.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certification.
Estonian scientists will search for life on Venus
Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) in collaboration with Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies is preparing three space missions to Venus to search for signs of life in the atmosphere, the "Current Camera" reported on Sunday.
The goal of the missions starting in five years is to assess the suitability of Venus' clouds for life, and then search for life there.
For the project, the scientists of Tartu proposed tools for measuring the acidity and oxygen content in the clouds of Venus.
Up until now, it has been assumed that the clouds of Venus, the closest planet to Earth, are too acidic for life to exist there, but it is likely that Venus was originally a terrestrial planet.
A sample from Venus should arrive during the third mission.
If we find life there, the main question will be whether it is similar to life on Earth or different.
If it is very similar, then it will be obvious that terrestrial life did not begin on Earth.
If it differs, then it may be more likely that life began on Earth," said Mikkhel Paisusel, the head of the Estonian team of the "Venus Life Finder" project.
A hat, not a phone...
For a whole year, and the price...
This Chinese nonsense has already gotten old...
They can't make a quality phone...
At least, my Samsung has already survived three of these (my friends have already thrown them away) and it will survive even more!
Metaverses will change the Russian business
The metaverse topic has become popular this fall, when Mark Zuckerberg announced the transformation of Facebook into Meta.
For the market, this event became a significant signal: the largest player confirmed the development of a new format of digital interaction between people.
Therefore, business in Russia, as in the rest of the world, will invest in the creation of their own metaverses and their subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as a continuation of the objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, the trend towards creating remote interactions in the conditions of a pandemic, because people are tired of isolation and restrictions.
On the other hand, this is a consequence of the business's desire to develop ecosystems and adapt its operations to them.
The third is a logical continuation of the trend of digitizing assets, where any rights, securities, works of art, and even money are digitized.
Anna, you are right, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating properly, you don't want to eat anything too fatty or unhealthy.
Of course, we will have the traditional olive salad and pickled herring, but no one is forcing me to eat it all at once.
You can eat it with a spoon, try it - and that's enough.
After all, there are ten days ahead, you can prepare any tasty and healthy dishes.
How much devil's work, time, and resources did she require for her training?
And after performing 5 quarter turns, she was left without a gold medal.
And she also understands that four years before the next Olympics she will not be able to do it, i.e. she will never be an Olympic champion.
And the one who did not engage in sports or cannot imagine all the circles of hell she has passed through, SHOULD NOT LAUGH AT HER.
The British economist was unable to provide a forecast for 2022
British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to give a forecast for 2022 because, in his opinion, such attempts would end in failure.
He wrote about it in an article for Project Syndicate.
The expert believes that the next year will be full of unpredictability and any trend can change the course.
The most important factor is the coronavirus pandemic, he believes.
O'Neill also admitted that he doesn't know if the price hikes are temporary or not.
As the specialist noted, even before the pandemic, it was clear that "the world of infinite generosity of central banks has already outlived itself" and it was time to return to the relationship where interest rates adjusted for inflation would correlate with expected growth rates of GDP.
O'Neill noted that in the face of the pandemic, the continuation of the ultra-soft economic policy could, according to some experts, lead to a new inflation surge.
In addition, O'Neill noted the issue of productivity growth, as well as the rise in poverty and climate change.
Earlier, the head of the global research department of “Open Investment” Mikhail Shulgin reported that positive expectations for the dollar in 2022 remain, but the potential for growth will be less significant.
Among the risks for the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and fiscal policy of the Federal Reserve, the dynamics of oil prices and fears in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic.
She had to agree.
But one thing is comforting: if you compare yourself to five years ago, there were fewer containers.
Now it is better.
Progress is slow, but steady.
There is another problem: in cities there are many environmental initiatives, but people are unaware of them.
Any kind of eco taxi that collects waste from the house.
The simple point of entry for second-hand goods is being used by the marginals.
Very few people bring glass and metal there.
And the author...
Sausages with cat fur on Soviet factories?
“Low” chocolate in the USSR?
Well, they're not as tasty as Doshirak, I understand...
But I would now turn over the Soviet confetti with white filling.
There are none left.
They don’t release “Pilot”, and “Romashka” is not the same…
Car mats EVA (square) for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
The car mats EVA are made of high-quality material produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats consists of cells in the shape of rectangles.
The thickness of the carpets is 10 mm, the depth of the cells is 5-6 mm.
The rugs do not absorb or transmit moisture.
Dirt is evenly distributed throughout the cells, keeping the surface clean.
The material used to make the mats is elastic, wear-resistant, and has no odor.
It maintains its properties in a temperature range from -50 to 50 °C.
The carpets are easy to care for and are suitable for year-round use.
The EVA mats cover the standard carpet completely, covering the left leg resting area.
The rear tunnel is closed with a carpet.
The edging is made from super-strong automotive cord.
Dimax Practic Basic Plus V13 180x220 cm mattress
The Dimax (Dimax) Practical Basis Plus 13 mattress consists of a single type of filling.
This is a 13 cm high artificial leather plate.
The mattress has a symmetric average stiffness due to the characteristics of the material.
The item is covered with a jacquard cover with a fastener on a comfortable layer, removable or non-removable, depending on your preference.
PPU is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial leather (PU) are characteristics similar to the natural analogue, but at a lower cost.
Artificial latex is elastic and elastic, but unlike natural material, it has greater rigidity.
It forms the anatomical surface of the mattress with high-quality support, which ensures a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not accumulate moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the longevity and wear resistance of the mattress.
A high-quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, affordable and temperature-resistant, this mattress is ideal for furnishing a bedroom in a country house or a dacha.
Among its merits are also the universal medium hardness and a maximum load of 100 kg, which makes this mattress suitable for most user categories.
Russians gave auto dealers about 4.5% of the country’s GDP
According to the results of the first 10 months of 2021, Russians spent 2.784 trillion rubles on the purchase of new cars, which is 28% more than in the same period of the previous year, according to the statistics of the Russian Automotive Market Research (RAMP) agency.
To understand the scale - about the same amount (about 3 trillion rubles) was spent by the state on supporting citizens and the economy during the coronavirus pandemic.
In September last year, President Vladimir Putin said that such a sum was comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) for 2020.
According to market revenues in Russia, the Korean brand Kia leads.
Over the past 10 months of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 32.57 billion rubles, which is almost 24% more than the previous year.
The growth of the related Kia brand of Hyundai is even more significant - more than 35%, and the revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at 27.93 billion rubles.
On the leading positions, this brand and by increasing the average car price - over the year, Hyundai grew by almost 21%, to 1.94 million rubles - the dynamics of price growth was only stronger than that of Changan, Chery, Geely and Mercedes-Benz.
At the same time, the sales volumes of Korean brands grew not so much: according to the statistics of the Automobile Manufacturers Committee of the Association of European Business in Russia, Kia sold 9.4% more cars over the same period last year.
Hyundai - almost 12%.
The Japanese Toyota closes the top three in terms of sales volume in monetary terms in Russia - Russians spent 27.55 billion rubles on Toyota cars over the past 10 months, which is 14% more than a year ago.
Japanese cars follow Mercedes-Benz with a figure of 26.61 billion rubles (+75%) - the German premium brand's volume of sales (up 37%) and average vehicle price (up 28%, to 8.2 million rubles).
“At Mercedes-Benz, both sales and average price are growing at the same time - more, for example, than at BMW - which is why the financial capacity is growing as well, explained the general director of the National Academy of Public Administration, Tatiana Arabadzhi.
In terms of growth in sales, fantastic figures are being demonstrated by Chinese brands, which have also significantly increased their financial capacity this year."
The Russian Lada demonstrates average growth in income (plus 28%), and Russians spent 22.94 billion rubles on cars of this brand over the past 10 months.
At the level of last year, companies are those whose sales of cars in units in 2021 fell: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is in the red - Russians spent 12 billion rubles on off-road vehicles and pick-ups of this brand over the past 10 months, which is less than 12.4 billion rubles last year.
Against the backdrop of problems with the supply of auto components and production disruptions affecting the entire global automotive industry, automakers continue to constantly adjust prices - the same "AvtoVAZ" raised the cost of models seven times over the past year, the last price increase (by 8-10 thousand rubles) took place at the end of November.
Regularly rewrite their price lists for their own products and those of other automakers.
The volume of the Russian automotive market in monetary terms will continue to grow - in addition to the shortage of cars, inflation is also contributing to this, as well as the desire of automakers to make up for past losses, experts say.
In the context of a car shortage, I think that many carmakers have even managed to partially pass on the costs of previous periods, which they could not include in the price of cars earlier,
Vladimir Bespalov, an analyst at VTB Capital, says: -
I think the financial side of the car industry is feeling very good at the moment, with high margins on sales."
The indirect indicator of this is the growth rate of car prices, which is observed in 2021, the expert clarifies.
In the long run, the market will grow both in terms of quantity and in terms of money, but mainly due to inflation and the complexity of the machines themselves, predicts Bespalov.
As supply increases, the opportunity to raise prices will be limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian car market will continue to grow and in the future, even if the cost of cars slows down, car manufacturers will be able to get their income from volumes, notes independent automotive consultant Sergei Burgazliev.
Considering the increased demand and insufficient supply, car manufacturers are now trying to get the highest profit from each sold car, notes Burgazliev. -
It is not expected that production volumes will increase in the near future, and the situation in Russia is further aggravated by the uncertainty of citizens about the future.
In the face of the situation on the market, cars have become a good investment object - a car bought a year ago, even with mileage, can now be sold for more than its original cost, notes the expert.
Biden has spoken about the transfer of US military to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The US leadership has never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a "Russian invasion."
President of the United States Joe Biden made such a statement.
"Never was such a plan," the White House chief said in response to a question from a journalist about whether the United States had rejected such an idea.
Biden noted that in the event of an escalation of the situation around Ukraine, Russia would face economic consequences.
He stressed that the United States and NATO do not have any obligations to use military force to protect Ukraine in the event of escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of using American troops unilaterally to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invaded Ukraine, the United States would shift forces to Eastern European NATO countries (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, Czech Republic and Estonia).
"We're going to have to send more American and NATO troops to the eastern flank, B9 - all the NATO countries that we have a sacred obligation to protect them from any attack from Russia," Biden said.
Earlier, the press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, noted that Moscow does not have any intentions to invade the territory of Ukraine.
Moscow, he said, sees the problem in the combat use of Turkish drones by Kiev, as well as in the fact that "American weapons are approaching our territory."
I immediately leave such interviews.
If they want to make me listen to screams, wait hours, drink an incomprehensible brew and wash my mouth out with it during the interview - it's terrifying to imagine what it will be like on the job.
I will find a normal place, without the middleman, where I can immediately talk to the manager.
Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 100x185 cm
The medium-height Protex-Orient Monolith Combi 16 mattress is made from alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is medium-hard, the other is moderately hard.
The elegant white leather cover is made of synthetic leather and is decorated with lightning bolts around the perimeter.
Two types of filler.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of fillings.
Between the plastic sheets, thin sheets of coconut coir are laid.
The layered structure of the mattress has increased wear resistance, durability and resistance to loads.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, breathable material by its characteristics.
The filler maintains its shape and quickly recovers after loads.
Coconut coir strengthens the product, has natural antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows for the creation of a load-bearing orthopedic bed that will serve customers for many years.
Universality and orthopedic support.
Mattresses are suitable for people of different body types and ages.
The medium-firm surface is universal and balanced combination of orthopedics and comfort.
The reverse side of the model is less comfortable for soft tissues, but has more pronounced orthopedic properties.
A moderately firm sleeping surface is more relevant for those who need to "decompress" their spines and get a good night's sleep.
The mattress is ideal for one person or a couple.
The latest mattresses have a stable surface and the absence of the "wave" effect, where vibrations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the other, disturbing a sleeper in their sleep.
The tabletop "Studio" 20*24*54(65) cm for canvas 40 cm.
The desk monitor "Studio" with a height-adjustable upper holder.
It will suit small-sized canvases.
The material is natural beech, lacquered.
It will be convenient for both beginners and professional artists.
Smooth adjustment of the angle of inclination.
It is equipped with a pegboard for canvases and tablets.
The top clamp securely holds the canvas.
The maximum height of a molier is 65 cm, and the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a scammer calls from a similar number, like a "police officer" or another law enforcement agency, then it's not effective to just hang up, and it's probably too late to add the number to a blacklist.
Because he quickly repeats his lie about his connection to the security forces, and continues to harass and threaten.
We need more useful advice for the people.
That's nonsense.
I don't believe it at all.
They no longer know what to accuse anyone of.
They reached the Queen.
And the main thing, according to them, is that everyone is to blame, except for the most-most...
And it would be easier to leave people alone from coercion, of course, if we cared about our people.
Maybe all the strains of the virus will disappear...
As in Japan... before the elections, the influence and infections decreased...
The "Assortment No. 2" wool set is 100% merino wool, 4x10 g.
Shearing as a craft began eight thousand years ago, but it was very difficult to find wool from animals, and even more so to find coloured wool.
But now, wow!
Introducing a delicate natural wool for knitting from a Russian manufacturer, which you don't have to run through the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of wool allow for the creation of bright and unique items.
For example, you can make a cute toy for yourself or your baby, appliqués for creativity, jewelry, interior decorations, and even clothing and accessories.
Imagine a pair of fluffy lambs on your pillow, a small photo frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that will look great with your new dress, or unique home slippers that no one else will have...
Bring your ideas to life by "crushing" this amazing fur!
Maria Kartazova, what does that mean?
I don't voice my thoughts, I mentally curse you all.
I mentally cut off the heads of everyone who didn't give me a place, mentally threw them into a pit and burned all the machines that were in my way, mentally!
And from the outside, I can even smile at you.
But I remember that the thought is material!
Peter, the Second Nicholas did not sign a single death sentence during his reign.
Even to the likes of Koba and his gang.
And bloody Sunday is already a Bolshevik invention.
Mattress Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190.
The mattress is hard on both sides.
Natural latex coconut coir does not cause allergic reactions and adds the necessary firmness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK spring block (512 springs per sleeping place) will provide you with unique comfort and correct support for your spine during sleep.
A cotton jacquard scarf, knitted on 200g.
The hollocone provides protection and comfort.
The maximum load on one sleeping place: 130 kg.
My horse.
A house for a pony with accessories, in a display of 6 pieces.
The adorable pony lives in a cozy, foldable pink cottage.
If you open the cottage, you can install a kitchen in one of its halves and a table in the other half, placing snacks for guests on it.
Puppies have big eyes, their mane and tail can be brushed with a comb.
The set includes: a 9 cm pony, a rattle, a house (2 halves), an in-built table (2 parts), a kitchen (2 parts), accessories: scissors (2 parts), a heart-shaped cake (2 parts), a soda bottle, 2 glasses, a teapot, a cup and a plate.
MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90x190x27, weight 27.9 kg.
Alternating layers of latex and hard coconut shell provide a body-hugging effect.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress can support a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
However, there is no wave effect: the spouses lying next to each other do not slide towards each other regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model have undergone rigorous quality control.
They are ventilated, do not mold, do not absorb odors.
A unique microclimate is created thanks to full air circulation, which promotes healthy rest.
High-strength thermal tape was used to bond the parts together.
The film of Alexander Sokurov’s student won the European “Oscar” for the best editing
The Russian film "Holding Hands" nominated for the "Oscar" received the award of the European Film Academy (also known as the "European Oscar") in the "Best Editing" category, reports "Moskovsky Komsomolets".
The online voting by the competition jury, in the midst of a complicated epidemiological situation, assessed the outstanding craftsmanship of the film's creators.
This time, the maximum number of awards went to the film by Jasmila Žbanić (Bosnia) "Where are you going, Aida?"
The main character of the film is a translator at the UN mission who is trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the drama "Holding Hands," directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of the Alexander Sokurov workshop), this film tells about the difficult relationship between a powerful father and the children who want to break free from their father's guardianship in North Ossetia.
Earlier it was announced that this film was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As regular friendly meetings between the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan, and Turkey show, in my opinion, you are not in the right place.
Only yesterday, the President of Azerbaijan approved the opening of the joint Azerbaijani-Russian KamAZ plant.
